{"post-56430": {"user": "The Divine Empire of Vessia", "user_num": 1951, "timestamp": "1479866803000", "message": "The Holy Palace of the Imperial family, this serves as the home of the Emperor and his family, his court, and as a small reserve station of Vessia's elite forces. It is going under some renovation for the new Emperor who is still living in his estate, but will soon move in.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": ["http://i.imgur.com/B1r9L79.jpg", "http://i.imgur.com/92Ktzwk.jpg"], "html": "The Holy Palace of the Imperial family, this serves as the home of the Emperor and his family, his court, and as a small reserve station of Vessia's elite forces. It is going under some renovation for the new Emperor who is still living in his estate, but will soon move in.\u00a0"}, "post-56527": {"user": "The Divine Empire of Vessia", "user_num": 1951, "timestamp": "1480014313000", "message": "A message would be sent out to the nobility and other important people of the country that they were invited to the palace for the Inauguration of the Emperor of Vessia. While not obligated, it would be well known that if they did not they would be looked down upon. A they were told to assemble in front, behind, at the centre of the great assembly of the military in the courtyard. The Emperor would arrive soon.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A message would be sent out to the nobility and other important people of the country that they were invited to the palace for the Inauguration of the Emperor of Vessia. While not obligated, it would be well known that if they did not they would be looked down upon. A they were told to assemble in front, behind, at the centre of the great assembly of the military in the courtyard. The Emperor would arrive soon.\u00a0"}, "post-56531": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480022722000", "message": "Lady Catalina road beside her brother, Lord Ruther, as they made their way into Augustgrad and toward the Imperial Palace. She had never been to some place so regal before, and as her palfrey moved easily beneath her, she reached up and pulled her deep, forest green hood even further over her face.It was lightly snowing, and people seemed to be happy with the weather. There was a certain cheer coming present as the wintertide festivals seemed to be looming closer. The Emperor couldn't have planned better timing for his inauguration. The people would certainly be happy with him, as they were usually happy during these times. Catalina made a mental note that she'd have to do some shopping while she was in the capital, for surely this would be the place to get the perfect gifts for those she cared about back home. Given the scared climate of Swavia's territories, they could use a little cheer.\"We won't have time to procure rooms. Damn,\" Ruther said under his breath.Catalina turned back to look at him. \"It's no issue of mine, brother,\" she said, her tone a little wry, a little teasing.Ruther, her twin brother, older by thirteen minutes, gave her a glance. \"It will be my first meeting with the new Emperor, and I'll look a peasant.\"She blinked. \"I didn't take you to be so vain. I'm sure no one will confuse you with the peasantry.\"\"It's not that, Lina,\" Ruther snapped a little harshly. \"First impressions mean so much, and I was hoping to make a good one. The coffers aren't as plentiful as they should be. Your gowns alone--\"\"-- I didn't ask for new gowns!\"\"--I know. But appearances matter. Come.\" He dismounted and gave his reins to the stable lads, then turned to lift his hands to his sister. \"It's time to see the new Emperor of Vessia.\" There was a small smile on his face as he said it.Catalina huffed, but she moved into his arms and let her brother take her from her horse. He pushed the hood off her head so her dark hair could be seen and the lightly jeweled pins that kept it from her face. Ruther traced a finger down her jawline. \"Beautiful,\" he grinned with pride. \"We might find you a husband.\"\"Yes, that's what I want,\" Catalina said dryly, making him laugh as he held her by her velvet-gloved hand and moved into the crowds of nobility that moved to await the Emperor's introduction and ceremony.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Lady Catalina road beside her brother, Lord Ruther, as they made their way into Augustgrad and toward the Imperial Palace. She had never been to some place so regal before, and as her palfrey moved easily beneath her, she reached up and pulled her deep, forest green hood even further over her face."}, "post-56549": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480041615000", "message": "Archduke Isenbardus rode towards the Imperial Palace at a brisk pace, his fur cloak billowing out behind him. He paid little attention to the buildings about him, many quite impressive in their own right to those first witnessing them. He would have much preferred to stay holed up in his fortress, but protocol demanded he be present for the emperor's inauguration. Still, he had voted for Rexus to become the next emperor, so it was only proper he show up for this event. Reaching his destination, the palace itself, Isenbardus smoothly dismounted his horse. His mount was a fine specimen, possessing a shimmering coat of gray and clear blue eyes, nearly the same color as his own. Sadly, the beast was almost past its prime, and he would do as he always did when something he possessed was past its prime. Discard it. Waving over a stable boy, he deftly flicked a silver coin to the young lad, addressing him quietly in a tone that brooked no argument. \u201cYou ensure it gets the best fodder you have to offer and make sure it gets a good wiping down. Also, I want fresh water brought for it.\u201dThe stable boy quickly scurried off, the horse in tow, to do as he had ordered. The staff of his family in hand, Isenbardus moved towards the place the inauguration would take place, each of his steps emphasized by a thump of his staff on the ground below. He had little trouble making his way through the crowd, for the few who didn\u2019t recognize the family crest on top the staff, did recognize the danger of having their toes crushed by it.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Archduke Isenbardus rode towards the Imperial Palace at a brisk pace, his fur cloak billowing out behind him. He paid little attention to the buildings about him, many quite impressive in their own right to those first witnessing them. He would have much preferred to stay holed up in his fortress, but protocol demanded he be present for the emperor's inauguration. Still, he had voted for Rexus to become the next emperor, so it was only proper he show up for this event. "}, "post-56577": {"user": "The Divine Empire of Vessia", "user_num": 1951, "timestamp": "1480093883000", "message": "A jet black coach with an indistinguishable crest would come to the palace, and out would step the new Emperor (who some may notice bore a few cuts on his face) along with some Guards. The doors would not close right away, but two more soldiers would step out with a big tarp covering something that was squirming and making muffled noises. They would all go through one of the side entrances, most likely going up to the large balcony to address all those assembled in the courtyard. Soon several platoons would march up to the palace and assemble in perfect ranks both in and outside the courtyard. Some were ordinary State troops, others personal soldiers of Lord Rexus prior to him being Emperor, some were even Knights of various Orders and Nobility within the Empire. The speech, and inauguration would occur soon.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A jet black coach with an indistinguishable crest would come to the palace, and out would step the new Emperor (who some may notice bore a few cuts on his face) along with some Guards. The doors would not close right away, but two more soldiers would step out with a big tarp covering something that was squirming and making muffled noises. They would all go through one of the side entrances, most likely going up to the large balcony to address all those assembled in the courtyard. Soon several platoons would march up to the palace and assemble in perfect ranks both in and outside the courtyard. Some were ordinary State troops, others personal soldiers of Lord Rexus prior to him being Emperor, some were even Knights of various Orders and Nobility within the Empire. The speech, and inauguration would occur soon."}, "post-56608": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480116110000", "message": "She was the last person to want to be in the palace for an event like that, but it was required of her to join her father for the trip... He'd had ordered several new gowns be made for the occasion and had a hand in what they looked like to a point... Though she didn't know that part as she waled behind him to where the event was eing held.Cerridwyn was a beauty. all deced out in a sapphire kirtle over a white shift, a silver girdle made up od discs, wore a simple circlet over her brow to match the silver embroidery, and her dark tresses loose to indicate she was a maiden. She had a trim figure, slightly less endowed in the bosom than most, and stood of an average height. The most striking feature were her gem like, blue eyes that were set below delicate brows and framed with thick lashes. She had a pert nose, and rosepetal lips...Her father made sure to position them just so, obvious for those in the room to take notice, for this was her first time in court. His intentions were quite obvious by the way he nade sure that she was in front, possibly to attract the attention of someone who would be very influental.  He seemed to know that she would do his bidding, for though she cast looks, she was meek and obedient...She gave a sigh the way any teen would as they waited for the place to fill up. She really wasn't glad to be there, for she had plenty of other things to be concerned with. Regardless, her wishes meant nothing,\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was the last person to want to be in the palace for an event like that, but it was required of her to join her father for the trip... He'd had ordered several new gowns be made for the occasion and had a hand in what they looked like to a point... Though she didn't know that part as she waled behind him to where the event was eing held."}, "post-56612": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480120132000", "message": "Finally, the time had come. The great doors at balcony opened, and out stepped the Emperor. He towered over most of his peers, a devious smile and overall expression upon his face. He would be dragging some struggling figure tied up and obscured by cloth and throw them down to be partially obscured by the railing. If the audience paid attention they might notice his foot was raised; clearly he was standing on this person. After a little he motioned for one of his personal soldiers to shackle this person. With a sigh of relaxation and finally revealing his pearly white teeth, he would stand to attention along with the military as the anthem played. It was generally expected that the male nobility would stand to attention be they military or not, whilst the women folk were expected to hold a curtsy whilst is played. After it was over, the Emperor turned and began to kneel for the Lord Eclessiarch who know came out of another door. The man would read some generic texts, and then pour the holy contents of a waterskin upon his head. Once done he would turn and shout to the people assembled. \"I present to you,\u00a0our now Divine Ruler, the Lord of all Vessia, protector of mankind and all that is good!\" Satisfied, he would back up and stand among the others with the Emperor. Afterwards would approach the Master-Overseer of the Witch Hunters, and do that traditional one minute stare in which as per tradition Lord Aleksander did not blink, flinch or even breathe. The leaders of several Knightly Orders would form the marks of their Orders in the air in front of him with their Swords and then go back to their places too. He shook the hands of each Chieftain of the Eastern tribes loyal to the Empire and recited their greeting perfectly in their language. Once it seemed that all the formalities and minor trials were done, he turned to the audience with a kick and a spit to the figure he threw down earlier. Spreading his hands apart in the air, flowers would seem to fall from nowhere in the sky, a rainbow would form and the sun would shine brightly as ever despite it being early winter. It would start slow, but grow with each and every millisecond. The great cheer, screams of adoration and love for their chosen representative of the Gods. The enigmatic beast of a man standing before them was now by all means their Emperor. Unbeknown to all but him a small power-maddened chuckle would grow from him. He looked into the distance for a few moments. He was now the ruler of all that he would lay his eyes upon, it was all now his. Anyone he asked would kneel for him without a thought. Finally waving his hands to show the people that they had to quiet down, he would begin his speech, the chorus that followed after each part would be known to a considerable few who would impart it to those who did not.My Dear people! It is an honour to be elected as your Emperor, and to be given this divine right to rule. To be the Lord of all Vessia, to be so holy! This is a wonder many an Imperator had fought for, and I am relieved that the struggle is over. To the people who I competed with for this position: hold no grudge. You did well, and were close. You may have well been where I am now but it seems that such is not the fate. I hold no grudge either to those who competed with me or voted for another; we will do this all together for our united Glory!Glory to the Emperor! Glory to the Imperium! Glory to Mankind!I have been anointed by every member of our Imperium. I am the divine Lord, and I will bring wonders to you all. I see the sufferings that plague many, I will solve them. I will toil among the lowest of the low to show my willingness! \u00a0However there is a long road ahead, and we must work together. We must all show willingness to make this Holy Land better. Show me!Glory to the Emperor! Glory to the Imperium! Glory to Mankind!I have travelled all of the Imperium prior to the Inauguration. I have seen horrible things which Emperor Wladimir (Gods Bless His Soul) has sadly not been able to devote his attention to. Well I tell you know, I will devote my attention to every part of the wonder known as Vessia!\"Glory to the Emperor! Glory to the Imperium! Glory to Mankind!At this point he would pull up the figure he had thrown to the floor and remove the hood upon it. He revealed a young woman with night-black eyes and just slightly pointed ears along with several tattoos, a few luminescent.\u00a0I have been in many hunts for Witches such as these, but I was never more horrified than when I set eyes upon this half-breed of mankind and one of the lesser folk! And it is a witch, aided by people of this land no less! Only two things lighten my anger. The fact that no man of good stock would consort with such horrors, and that this stain upon our world is to be removed!With that he threw the figure down. As it hit the marble floor with a light thud, his own personal troops ran forth to cut the struggling being. They did not do cuts particularly deep, just painful ones. The maddened laughter and squelches of blood and tissue flying everywhere would be drowned out by the chant.\u00a0Glory to the Emperor! Glory to the Imperium! Glory to Mankind!Join me! Join me in this wonderful new era to set in after the tragic death of our last Emperor. Let us claim revenge on the foul things that lie to the East! Now, I shall adjourn to the Court where those who wish to see me immediately shall. Afterwards I shall be visiting the country as a whole. Then I will lead a grand expedition to strike down the new evil forming in Swavia. Glory to the Gods, Saints, Angels, and the fallen.\u00a0Glory to the Emperor! Glory to the Imperium! Glory to Mankind!The Emperor, smiling once more would leave the court to a roaring populace and some carnage. Those who wanted his audience now, would get it.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Finally, the time had come. The great doors at balcony opened, and out stepped the Emperor. He towered over most of his peers, a devious smile and overall expression upon his face. He would be dragging some struggling figure tied up and obscured by cloth and throw them down to be partially obscured by the railing. If the audience paid attention they might notice his foot was raised; clearly he was standing on this person. After a little he motioned for one of his personal soldiers to shackle this person. With a sigh of relaxation and finally revealing his pearly white teeth, he would stand to attention along with the military as the anthem played. It was generally expected that the male nobility would stand to attention be they military or not, whilst the women folk were expected to hold a curtsy whilst is played. After it was over, the Emperor turned and began to kneel for the Lord Eclessiarch who know came out of another door. The man would read some generic texts, and then pour the holy contents of a waterskin upon his head. Once done he would turn and shout to the people assembled. \"I present to you,\u00a0our now Divine Ruler, the Lord of all Vessia, protector of mankind and all that is good!\" Satisfied, he would back up and stand among the others with the Emperor. Afterwards would approach the Master-Overseer of the Witch Hunters, and do that traditional one minute stare in which as per tradition Lord Aleksander did not blink, flinch or even breathe. The leaders of several Knightly Orders would form the marks of their Orders in the air in front of him with their Swords and then go back to their places too. He shook the hands of each Chieftain of the Eastern tribes loyal to the Empire and recited their greeting perfectly in their language. Once it seemed that all the formalities and minor trials were done, he turned to the audience with a kick and a spit to the figure he threw down earlier. Spreading his hands apart in the air, flowers would seem to fall from nowhere in the sky, a rainbow would form and the sun would shine brightly as ever despite it being early winter. It would start slow, but grow with each and every millisecond. The great cheer, screams of adoration and love for their chosen representative of the Gods. The enigmatic beast of a man standing before them was now by all means their Emperor. Unbeknown to all but him a small power-maddened chuckle would grow from him. He looked into the distance for a few moments. He was now the ruler of all that he would lay his eyes upon, it was all now his. Anyone he asked would kneel for him without a thought. Finally waving his hands to show the people that they had to quiet down, he would begin his speech, the chorus that followed after each part would be known to a considerable few who would impart it to those who did not."}, "post-56617": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480131551000", "message": "The Archduke went through the motions that were required during the Emperors inauguration and speech. He offered polite applause when it was called for, stood to attention during the anthem, and even recited the various chants. Although it was unlikely to be noticed due to the large crowd he was in, if any paid close attention, they would find Isenbardus looking rather bored by the whole affair. He always found these inaugurations taking themselves far too seriously for what they truly were. Empty promises were offered as freely as beer at a festival and everyone took the Emperor\u2019s word as gospel. Well, not everyone, but many did and everyone at least appeared to be approving of the Emperor\u2019s selection, lest they want to find themselves having an unfortunate accident. Still, he had endured many inaugurations, he would put on the same act for this one as the others. The Archduke studied the witch impassively as she was revealed. Executing those hated by Vessian\u2019s was always a way to gain popularity with the nobility and in this case even moreso with Witch Hunters. It seemed this Emperor wished to crackdown on Witches and most likely other non-humanoid creatures. Many villages might soon find themselves without a healer or medicine man in the coming days\u2026 His fellow nobles seemed quite pleased by the death of the witch, that was ensured to be quite a painful one as the warriors inflicted numerous light cuts on her. What a waste, but the favor it bought for the Emperor was perhaps worth it. Isenbardus had to suppress a rather heartless chuckle at the mention of the previous Emperor\u2019s death, considering the circumstances surrounding it. Now all that was left was to congratulate the Emperor on his victory. Staff still in hand, Isenbardus would get in the growing line to have an audience with the new Emperor. Although he didn\u2019t expect to hear much of note, he would still listen to what others said as they spoke to the Emperor. Most of what was to be said would be fluff, but perhaps he could glean something from it. When his time finally came to speak to the Emperor, Isenbardus approached, stopping about five meters away from where the Emperor was. Staff still in one hand, he placed the other across his chest and smoothly bowed to the Emperor. It was deep enough to show respect, but not quite as deep as those of a lesser station would offer. He would then look up, locking eyes with the new Emperor and offering him a smile.\u201cI offer my most sincere congratulations to you, Glorious Emperor of Vessia. When I heard you had been selected to be the next Emperor, it brought great joy to my heart. I am sure you will bring about another golden age to Vessia and crush all the enemies and heretics that dare to stand against us. Even in your very appearance, you resemble the great Emperors of old, tall and powerful in both body and mind. May you be remembered for millennia to come!\u201d Isenbardus was well rehearsed when it came to offering praise and as such, his words would be filled with sincerity and conviction. Such a reaction from him was to be expected, he was a young elector from a house of great influence, offering support to the newly elected Emperor who was near his own age was a move that could be easily predicted by those who knew Vessian politics. Although he hadn\u2019t outright stated it, it would be clear to the Emperor he had been one of the electors who had voted for him, a fact he could verify with his other sources no doubt. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Archduke went through the motions that were required during the Emperors inauguration and speech. He offered polite applause when it was called for, stood to attention during the anthem, and even recited the various chants. Although it was unlikely to be noticed due to the large crowd he was in, if any paid close attention, they would find Isenbardus looking rather bored by the whole affair. "}, "post-56619": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480133332000", "message": "This whole thing was a farce to her. It was wrong. She found herself growing darker, but kept her expression as serene as possible. She was especially disgusted by the treatment of the one that was called a witch... It was wrong... ALL wrong! The Lady Cerridwyn was going through all the motions, the unnecessarily long curtsying that caused the legs of many ladies to ache and burn, the applause, all of it. Then she found herself being ushered foreward by her father to pay respects to the emperor he was not neccesarily pleased with either.When it was their turn, she curtsied as Lord Rouvi\u00e8re bowed. \"Many congratulations on your election, your Eminence. May your reign be a long and productive one,\" said the graying Lord, and she said the same, in essence, as her father. There were too many in line for a very drawn out gushing.After they had moved aside to let the next set of well wishers do their thing, she found herself wanting to get as far away from the spot where the poor soul had been killed, finding she had no stomach for the disgusting act. Aye, it only spurred her ambitions of a safe way to remove innocent people from the equation so they wouldn't be slaughtered, for some of the souls in question were probably just normal people who were accused of witcraft by someone whose cow died and crops failed.Indeed, this whole display was vile, in her abject opinion.As she took a step to the side, she felt her father's hand close gently around her upper arm, and he leaned in to say for just her ears, \"My daughter, I understand you wish to be elsewhere... But for the my sake, please be patient.\" Again, he found another place to stand and kept her by his side. She tuned him out eventually, so was quite blessedly ignorant of him trying to find her a future husband without outright saying it.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "This whole thing was a farce to her. It was wrong. She found herself growing darker, but kept her expression as serene as possible. She was especially disgusted by the treatment of the one that was called a witch... It was wrong... ALL wrong! The Lady Cerridwyn was going through all the motions, the unnecessarily long curtsying that caused the legs of many ladies to ache and burn, the applause, all of it. Then she found herself being ushered foreward by her father to pay respects to the emperor he was not neccesarily pleased with either."}, "post-56627": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480177868000", "message": "The Emperor stared at Elector Isenbardus, sizing the man up from his throne. He felt a bit awkward in it as it was designed for someone at least a foot shorter. Still, he had to make do for now and rested his chin on his gloved hand. He smiled at the congratulations, the power-hunger and delight not yet escaping him. Then realisation dawned upon the Emperor. The man had voted for him and was expecting him to return a favour in the future. He kept on smiling with his mouth but the rest of his face changed quickly. He did not like being in debt to someone, much less somebody so enigmatic and ominous. Then he returned to a whole smile.Let me tell you a story Archduke. Millennia ago, St. John, one of the core founders of our faith was giving sermons about how one is supposed to speak from the heart, and do good and kindness without expecting any sort of mortal reward. When a law-maker amidst the crowd shouted that such a thing was silly, and that there is no point in doing good without receiving benefits in return. Saint John smote the man mightily, the details of the man's survival and precise fate are schismatic and I shan't touch upon them but such is the story.Knowing his point would probably have come across at least in part he wearily sighed and pinched the bridge of his nose. Eyes closed he waved a hand dismissively.But of course, kindness should be repaid if one can.\u00a0Those who aided me shall not find me ungrateful, I suppose. I thank you for your congratulations Archduke, they bring joy to my heart and a big one it is as you can imagine. It's not particularly a secret or news but mobilise your private regiment in the near future, we are going to Swavia. I do not think levies are necessary although if you wish to carve out some territory for yourself in particular you can bring some.With that he opened his eyes and looked the man up and down. The man was clever, and devious, perhaps even more than the Emperor. He wondered if he should keep a special eye on him but decided that so early it would be impolite. If that was all the next person would be called forth.Lady\u00a0Cerridwyn would find among the people present to marry the Archduke, along with\u00a0Protospatharius Nikos Komnenos  and a man who was in line to be Master Overseer of the Witch Hunters,\u00a0Helmut van der Minnenstein . All three nobles and present to approach should her father find interest in them. Some people would point at her and mutter when she did not look delighted by the proceedings of the Inauguration but they would quickly quiet down, knowing it was impolite to make rumours so publicly.\u00a0", "link_list": ["/user/1944", "/user/1938"], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor stared at Elector Isenbardus, sizing the man up from his throne. He felt a bit awkward in it as it was designed for someone at least a foot shorter. Still, he had to make do for now and rested his chin on his gloved hand. He smiled at the congratulations, the power-hunger and delight not yet escaping him. Then realisation dawned upon the Emperor. The man had voted for him and was expecting him to return a favour in the future. He kept on smiling with his mouth but the rest of his face changed quickly. He did not like being in debt to someone, much less somebody so enigmatic and ominous. Then he returned to a whole smile."}, "post-56632": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480185560000", "message": "The smile remained on the Archduke\u2019s face as Rexus told the story of St. John. It was always fun when the nobility used storytelling to get their points across. At some point in the future, he\u2019d have to repay the emperor\u2019s favor and tell him a story as well. As the emperor finished saying all he had to say, Isenbardus simply bowed once more, in the same smooth manner he had done so previously. Having nothing else to add, the Archduke headed back to where the rest of the nobles were mingling.Although he had no eyes on anyone in particular, considering he wasn\u2019t yet married at his age, it was the least he could do to allow fathers to try and sell him on why their daughter was the best bride he could ever find. He looked at it as a game almost, he would pretend to show a bit of interest, kiss their daughters hands and then talk a bit of business with the father. He didn\u2019t plan to stick around too long, however. He had things that needed to be done back in his fortress and it seemed he would be going with the emperor on an expedition. He normally wasn\u2019t particularly interested in expeditions, but as the emperor had given him permission to claim some land it was a golden opportunity that he didn\u2019t plan to let go to waste. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The smile remained on the Archduke\u2019s face as Rexus told the story of St. John. It was always fun when the nobility used storytelling to get their points across. At some point in the future, he\u2019d have to repay the emperor\u2019s favor and tell him a story as well. As the emperor finished saying all he had to say, Isenbardus simply bowed once more, in the same smooth manner he had done so previously. Having nothing else to add, the Archduke headed back to where the rest of the nobles were mingling."}, "post-56633": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480187793000", "message": "Of course, she would e introduced to the three in question. She forced a pretty smile on her face, and remained ever polite for the sake of her father. If, say, the Archduke were to e introduced, Lord Raoul would definitely puff his chest out with pride, and do his best...\"You remember my youngest daughter, yes, Your Grace? This is she, my Cerridwyn...\" Indeed, the young beauty was pulled forward a step so she could be shown off... But she felt rather ill in the presence of the Archduke... Why? She gave a graceful curtsy, being a good girl by remaining quiet as she lowered her lashes to hide a confused look. If the others showed any interest, she would remain polite and quiet, speaking only when spoken directly to - a highly desirable trait in young ladies of her age.Any of those who would mutter, if they decided to take a closer look, would probably get an impression that she was just acting her age, since she was only sixteen. Never mind that she was much more mature than that in spirit. And she was still blissfully unaware she was being shown off for the sake of matchmaking. Her mind was on being back at home.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Of course, she would e introduced to the three in question. She forced a pretty smile on her face, and remained ever polite for the sake of her father. If, say, the Archduke were to e introduced, Lord Raoul would definitely puff his chest out with pride, and do his best..."}, "post-56638": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480190306000", "message": "A slight smirk would appear on the Archduke\u2019s face as he saw Lord Raoul waving him over, although it quickly turned into a genuine looking smile by the time Lord Raoul actually was close enough to notice. He knew the reason the man wanted his attention, although that could probably be said of every noble in the room who had been paying any attention to Raoul. It was quite clear he wanted to marry his daughter off, preferably to someone above his station. The House of Steitz had been in good relations with the House of Rouviere for some time, however. And although Raoul wasn\u2019t one of the biggest players around, he was certainly not someone to brush aside.\u201cI certainly do remember Cerridwyn, Lord Raoul, after all, how could I forget such a beautiful young woman such as your daughter. She has certainly grown in beauty since I last saw her last year, they grow up so quickly don\u2019t they?\u201dIsenbardus eyed Cerridwyn up and down. His deep blue eyes stared at the young woman intently. This was perhaps the most unsettling part of the Archduke\u2019s appearance, for, despite his beautiful features, his eyes didn\u2019t belong to someone who hadn\u2019t even reached their thirties. Cerridwyn clearly wasn\u2019t very happy to have been pulled out to this event by her father, but she kept her mouth shut, a wise decision by her.  \u201cTell me Lady Cerridwyn\u2026 Do you like reading?\u201dThe voice which he addressed Cerridwyn in was a quiet one, with just a hint of playfulness in its tone. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A slight smirk would appear on the Archduke\u2019s face as he saw Lord Raoul waving him over, although it quickly turned into a genuine looking smile by the time Lord Raoul actually was close enough to notice. He knew the reason the man wanted his attention, although that could probably be said of every noble in the room who had been paying any attention to Raoul. It was quite clear he wanted to marry his daughter off, preferably to someone above his station. The House of Steitz had been in good relations with the House of Rouviere for some time, however. And although Raoul wasn\u2019t one of the biggest players around, he was certainly not someone to brush aside."}, "post-56643": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480193138000", "message": "\"Aye, Your Grace,\" she said with her musical sounding voice of an alto pitch. She took a moment to steel herself so she could meet his gaze, and she felt goosebumps arise on her flesh, as well as her hair standing at her nape as she always felt around him. He was most certainly a wolf in sheep's clothing, but she would never voice that thought aloud as it would be dangerous indeed. She would have to play along with this little game by answering his questions. Her eyes darkened a shade bluer as they peered at him, and she would feel her cheeks redden, but not with bashfulness like all would think.\"My father has prided himself upon letting his daughters be learned, so that we could run our households to the highest standards.\" She pretty much recited what he had said to all of them, then felt alarm welling up when she realized why she had been brought to court. One had to applaud her for the tamping down of her temper, for there was a brief glimpse of it after a look of dawning. She, again, forced a serene look upon her face for the sake of being a lady.Cerridwyn met the blue eyes again with her own blue eyes, and she gave a smile that did not touch her eyes, feeling much like a fly caught in a spider web.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Aye, Your Grace,\" she said with her musical sounding voice of an alto pitch. She took a moment to steel herself so she could meet his gaze, and she felt goosebumps arise on her flesh, as well as her hair standing at her nape as she always felt around him. He was most certainly a wolf in sheep's clothing, but she would never voice that thought aloud as it would be dangerous indeed. She would have to play along with this little game by answering his questions. Her eyes darkened a shade bluer as they peered at him, and she would feel her cheeks redden, but not with bashfulness like all would think."}, "post-56649": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480199243000", "message": "Although she masked it fairly well, the Archduke could still sense the young woman\u2019s apprehension of him. He wasn\u2019t particularly surprised, especially considering her father\u2019s blatant invitation to all wealthy male nobles, regardless of their age. Although not pleasant for Cerridwyn, her father was making the right decision in trying to marry her off for power. The man was ambitious and the Archduke could respect that.\u201cA wise decision by your father in letting you learn about various subjects. I can very much appreciate an intelligent woman, we have far too many ladies who are nothing more than a pretty face, if that even. I\u2019m sure you\u2019ve heard of my houses rather impressive library, possessing some books that even the imperial library doesn\u2019t possess. If you like studying such subjects, you and your father should come visit my fortress sometime.\u201dTurning his attention back to Lord Raoul, the Archduke would lower his voice slightly to make it harder for others around them to eavesdrop. \u201cI must thank you for the last set of horses I received from you, they\u2019re of very excellent quality as always. I\u2019ve been thinking I could do with a few more of them than usual as it seems the emperor plans to make a push at the barbarians. If I increase my metal shipments to you for the next year or so, is there any way you could get some extra horses to my fortress before the coming campaign into Swavia?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Although she masked it fairly well, the Archduke could still sense the young woman\u2019s apprehension of him. He wasn\u2019t particularly surprised, especially considering her father\u2019s blatant invitation to all wealthy male nobles, regardless of their age. Although not pleasant for Cerridwyn, her father was making the right decision in trying to marry her off for power. The man was ambitious and the Archduke could respect that."}, "post-56650": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480205191000", "message": "There was just something about the man that set her on edge... She looked at his face... Really stared, for this was the first opportunity she'd had ever had to get a really proper look. His face was similar to hers... She knew because she looked into her mother's looking glass enough. Surely... No... She found herself retreating a step and looking at her father, and back to the Archduke, and back again. It was certain that her father wasn't related in any way to the Archduke... Her stomach soured, and then she realized he was still speaking to her, then blurted out an, \"I'd love to,\" because father would have wanted her to say that even just to be polite, right?Her father listened as the Archduke spoke of the fine beasts, and he replied with a low murmur, \"Very well, Your Grace. I'll  not only send fresh horses to you, but I've had some most excellent tack produced in my villages. The metal pieces are made deliberately dull in sheen so as not to reflect the sunlight. Saddles and bits made specifically for battle. I will be sure that every new horse is outfitted, for your metal has made plenty of strong armor for the squires in training.\"She found herself staring again as they talked.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was just something about the man that set her on edge... She looked at his face... Really stared, for this was the first opportunity she'd had ever had to get a really proper look. His face was similar to hers... She knew because she looked into her mother's looking glass enough. Surely... No... She found herself retreating a step and looking at her father, and back to the Archduke, and back again. It was certain that her father wasn't related in any way to the Archduke... Her stomach soured, and then she realized he was still speaking to her, then blurted out an, \"I'd love to,\" because father would have wanted her to say that even just to be polite, right?"}, "post-56657": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480211212000", "message": "The Archduke watched the girls movements, same smile still plastered to his face. Perhaps she was noticing something she hadn\u2019t considered before\u2026 Poor girl, she was going to have a rather difficult life ahead of her unless Raoul was kind enough to find a suitor closer to her age, which was rather unlikely in his estimations. \u201cI\u2019m glad to hear that, Lady Cerridwyn. Consider yourself and your father welcome in my house anytime. I\u2019ll look forward to whenever you decide to come and visit.\u201dTurning to her father, he would nod as the man agreed to the bargain, even offering a bit extra. Not that it would be free, he would increase the metal sent to them to pay for both the horses and saddles.\u201cThank you for being so accommodating, Lord Raoul. I and my men have used tack produced by your house before and it\u2019s every bit as good as you claim. I shall ensure some rarer metals are included in the shipments over the next year. Although quite brutish, dwarves do know how to find some wondrous metals and create extremely useful alloys.\u201dOffering Lord Raoul a friendly clap on the shoulder, the Archduke would bid him and Cerridwyn his farewells and head back off into the crowd of nobles. He decided to stick around a bit longer to keep an eye on meetings happening between others in the nobility. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Archduke watched the girls movements, same smile still plastered to his face. Perhaps she was noticing something she hadn\u2019t considered before\u2026 Poor girl, she was going to have a rather difficult life ahead of her unless Raoul was kind enough to find a suitor closer to her age, which was rather unlikely in his estimations. "}, "post-56659": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480211611000", "message": "Nikandros has been there, among the \"VIP\" section of the nobility to watch the Emperor make his speech to much grandeur and applause. His face was set and composed and did not show much opinion on the matter. He clapped when others clapped, and he bowed his head when others bowed his head, but he did not speak much, save to murmur something to the man that stood at his left, and the man that stood at his right.The Rauczech retinue was among the palace, and like other nobles, Nikandros stood in line to speak to the Emperor. He had patience, it seemed. A lot of it. And he was not so proud that he was trying to use his position and prominence to shove himself to the beginning.If the Emperor chose to make time for him, Nikandros would be honored. If he did not, it did not appear that it would be any skin off of Nikandros' nose. His sharp hazel eyes instead watched the people around him as he waited.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nikandros has been there, among the \"VIP\" section of the nobility to watch the Emperor make his speech to much grandeur and applause. His face was set and composed and did not show much opinion on the matter. He clapped when others clapped, and he bowed his head when others bowed his head, but he did not speak much, save to murmur something to the man that stood at his left, and the man that stood at his right."}, "post-56661": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480213253000", "message": "She had never been to Augustgrad when an Emperor had been elected. She had always been in her home, where it was safe. Where her Grandmere had been. A frown traced her lips when she saw the tall, handsome new emperor come forward with some sort of being in his grasp, but her attention flickered away from whatever it was to watch as he was anointed by the Lord Ecclesiarch, and then moved onto the Witch Hunter Lord. It was only when he revealed the witch that Catalina's gut twisted and gasp fled her lips. She took a step forward, and she felt Ruther's steel grasp around her arm and his voice in her ear. \"Do not make a scene, Catalina,\" he warned her. \"We are not home. We are the capital city. We are here for favor. Do not make a scene,\" he repeated again.Heat flushed in her cheeks, anger flickering in her eyes. She felt magic pulsing in her own veins but she turned her head away so she wouldn't have to watch it, biting on her lip to keep herself from acting out. Ruther's hand remained like an iron clasp around her arm, and probably bruised the tender skin. She was wearing long sleeves, however, given the weather.How odd that this city was drowned in a chorus of applause and celebration, not only for\u00a0a new Emperor, but for the cheer of Wintertide as well... and there Catalina was, suddenly feeling as if she'd be ill (and preferably all over the new Emperor).It was foolish to think that anything would be different. These persecutions were real, and often, and her Grandmere had told her to be wise and to be discrete. If she had been alive, Catalina was sure that she would have not allowed Catalina to accompany Ruther to the capital, but she had wanted to go... had wanted to see...But now she'd seen too much.Afterwards, Lord Ruther moved in line to greet the Emperor, and over the heads he could see that the Archduke was also there. \"Look, Lina. The Archduke is here. We will have to meet with him next.\"\"I don't want to meet with anyone.\"\"Lina.\"\"I won't make a scene, but please don't make me wait in line to meet the Emperor. Look, they have refreshments out and entertainments. I'll behave myself elsewhere, brother.\" As he was no longer gripping her, it was too late to stop the amber-dressed woman as she moved away.Her cloak was given over to a servant in the palace, and the gown she wore and the shape that curved it could be seen beneath it -- deep amber velvet, given the weather, with filigree along the sleeves that were positioned just at the tips of her graceful shoulders, her dark hair gathered away from her face and held in a dark hair net so it revealed the gracefulness of her feminine bone structure. She was still angry, but she knew absolutely that she had to cool it. She glanced around at the people around her, and recognized a face that brought a smile to hers.\"Lady Cerridwyn!\" she called, and then cleared her throat and composed herself. It wouldn't do to shout. She made her way over to the beautiful gentlewoman and her noble father and she curtsied to them, minding her manners. \"It's lovely to see you again, and Lord Rouviere, hello.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She had never been to Augustgrad when an Emperor had been elected. She had always been in her home, where it was safe. Where her Grandmere had been. "}, "post-56662": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480213295000", "message": "Nikandros was granted audience shortly after the Archduke. Despite the fact that a Prince was Higher than an Archduke, Isenbardus had a gleam in his eyes that the Emperor was worried about. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nikandros was granted audience shortly after the Archduke. Despite the fact that a Prince was Higher than an Archduke, Isenbardus had a gleam in his eyes that the Emperor was worried about. "}, "post-56664": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480215841000", "message": "She gave a curtsy as the Archduke made his leave to do his rounds with others, then straightened up and pressed her hand to her ribs. Her heart was hammering in her chest and a horrified feeling had washed over her. She could only see the retreating back of the man she was beginning to suspect was related to her. No...The sound of her friend's approach did not immediately pull her from the sickened stare, but thankfully Raoul's voice greeting the girl brought Cerri back to the moment, and she gave a belated curtsy. \"It is so lovely to see you again, Lady Catalina.\" Did her voice sound watery? Perhaps, just a little. Hopefully her friend wouldn't catch on to her dangerous suspicions and think she was just as disgusted by the killing of the witch... Which had been true as well.She craned her head a little as she watched the man she was so transfixed with until he disappeared into the crowd, then she brought her full attention to the young lady who seemed to share her feelings on things. Then again, they WERE quite possibly the youngest two in the bunch, so it would hopefully not affect their futures too much to have reacted the way they did.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She gave a curtsy as the Archduke made his leave to do his rounds with others, then straightened up and pressed her hand to her ribs. Her heart was hammering in her chest and a horrified feeling had washed over her. She could only see the retreating back of the man she was beginning to suspect was related to her. No..."}, "post-56686": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480223781000", "message": "She smiled at Lord Raoul, and then noticed that Lady Cerridwyn couldn't seem to take her eyes off of someone. Lady Catalina turned, and she saw that it was the Archduke walking away from their direction. She knew of him, of course. He was the sovereign of her land. \"Cerridwyn,\" she said and reached out to put a hand on her arm, meant to take her from her attention on the man. She could tell that something bothered the other young woman, but she couldn't tell what it was exactly. \"Are you alright?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She smiled at Lord Raoul, and then noticed that Lady Cerridwyn couldn't seem to take her eyes off of someone. Lady Catalina turned, and she saw that it was the Archduke walking away from their direction. She knew of him, of course. He was the sovereign of her land. "}, "post-56691": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480225951000", "message": "When it was indeed Nikandros' turn to step forward toward the Emperor, he did so without pomp or circumstance. He bowed his head, a slight dip at his hips as well, but did not make himself subservient to the Emperor. When Nikandros lifted his crowned head again, his hazel eyes were direct and striking into that of Aleksander's own. \"Long live the Emperor,\" Nikandros murmured. \"Rauczech has high hopes for you, Your Imperial Highness,\" the Prince continued, his voice quiet and controlled, the sharp edge of a sword that was held in a relaxed hand. \"Especially in the dealings of Swavia and her people.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When it was indeed Nikandros' turn to step forward toward the Emperor, he did so without pomp or circumstance. He bowed his head, a slight dip at his hips as well, but did not make himself subservient to the Emperor. "}, "post-56695": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480226861000", "message": "The Emperor nodded and muttered vague thanks. This man did not seem as... sly as Isenbardus, so he did not bother with much to say to him. He seemed to make no subtle remarks like the Archduke either, no demands. Perhaps Nikandros was one of those who voted against him; one of the people he would have to have a \"chat\" with. He seemed to be one of the more classic, controllable rich kids he could deal with. Pamper them and sate their ego, and all is fine. Unless he had a demand, he would be dismissed and the next man sent in.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor nodded and muttered vague thanks. This man did not seem as... sly as Isenbardus, so he did not bother with much to say to him. He seemed to make no subtle remarks like the Archduke either, no demands. Perhaps Nikandros was one of those who voted against him; one of the people he would have to have a \"chat\" with. He seemed to be one of the more classic, controllable rich kids he could deal with. Pamper them and sate their ego, and all is fine. Unless he had a demand, he would be dismissed and the next man sent in.\u00a0"}, "post-56707": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480230330000", "message": "That was all Nikandros had to say to the Emperor. Platitudes for platitudes, niceties for niceties. Nikandros had voted for Aleksander, and the action spoke more than words could. He moved on, no muss, no fuss. There were other things that deserved his time than serving the Emperor's ego on his throne, and he was partially thankful that Aleksander didn't make him stay and say anything more.The Prince of Rauczech moved on, his retinue with him, to attend to other business in Augustgrad.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "That was all Nikandros had to say to the Emperor. Platitudes for platitudes, niceties for niceties. Nikandros had voted for Aleksander, and the action spoke more than words could. He moved on, no muss, no fuss. There were other things that deserved his time than serving the Emperor's ego on his throne, and he was partially thankful that Aleksander didn't make him stay and say anything more."}, "post-56722": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480264546000", "message": "\"Yes? Oh... Yes, I'm alright.\" She said on a heavy breath, then glanced to her father. \"May I be excused now?\" She left her second question of , \"Are you are done trying to sell me like a cow,\" on the silent, that question was not asked, but the other young lady might pick up on the irritation lacing her voice. Cerri was wise enough to bite her tongue, for it wouldn't do to get backhanded in court. Nonono. Her father, jovial that he had gotten the attention of the Archduke, even briefly, gave his nod.Cerri looped her arm through her friend's and said so only she could hear, \"My father is intent on making a match, his ambitions for finding someone higher ranked are blatant... He just tried to sell my hand to the Archduke and... well... I don't think it is wise.\" She left out her suspicions, for talking bad about a man like him could get her killed, and that wouldn't do either.\"You should come visit our home someday. We have the most beautiful horses, perhaps your brother would wish to see.\" She said that louder, so as to keep her father from getting his nose bent out if shape for her whispering. She wasn't seriously intending to pimp out horses.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Yes? Oh... Yes, I'm alright.\" She said on a heavy breath, then glanced to her father. \"May I be excused now?\" She left her second question of , \"Are you are done trying to sell me like a cow,\" on the silent, that question was not asked, but the other young lady might pick up on the irritation lacing her voice. Cerri was wise enough to bite her tongue, for it wouldn't do to get backhanded in court. Nonono. Her father, jovial that he had gotten the attention of the Archduke, even briefly, gave his nod."}, "post-56737": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480278169000", "message": "Catalina flashed a quick smile to Lord Raoul and moved off with Cerridwyn, matching her stride with the young woman's. Catalina was a bit taller than Cerridwyn, after all.\"Mm,\" Catalina agreed, looking over her shoulder to where Ruther still stood in line to make his greetings to the Emperor. \"So is Ruther. Although, I'm very sure he won't try to sell me hand to the Archduke.\" Catalina's gaze swept over Cerridwyn's face. \"That's... very ambitious. I suppose he's handsome enough however, if that matters to you.\"\"I would love to visit! Perhaps we might. After we finish our business in Augustgrad, we'll be home only for a few days before we then have to travel to Steitz for a meeting with the Archduke himself. I'll take a look about his home and tell you if I discover any hidden bodies.\" Catalina nudged Cerridwyn to get her to smile a little, a teasing tone.\"I don't mean this to be rude, Cerri,\" Catalina said, a little concern in her voice as she frowned slightly and reached out to cover Cerri's hand with her own, \"but I think you and I are... well. We're just mere ladies. I think you may be safe from any marriage with the Archduke, or the Emperor.\" The way Catalina said the Emperor's title gave obvious insight into how she felt about him. \"That poor woman...\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Catalina flashed a quick smile to Lord Raoul and moved off with Cerridwyn, matching her stride with the young woman's. Catalina was a bit taller than Cerridwyn, after all."}, "post-56769": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480288262000", "message": "The woman who was next called forward to greet the new Emperor of Vessia had a... reputation... to put it lightly. She had been from a lowborn noble house, but she had been exquisite at court, so it is said. Where the former Emperor had wanted to make her a mistress, the Duke of Hapsburg-Portainne had wanted to make her a wife, and so he had.With her influence, she had put her brother into the church, and it seemed that the apple did not fall far from the tree. As Aurelia rose in prominence in the Augustgrad Court, her brother rose in Prominence with the church. They were ambitious, they were beautiful, and they were deadly... or so it was rumored.She had done well for herself -- very well for herself -- and had given birth to two children very quickly, a daughter who would never be as beautiful as her mother, yet pretty enough still, and a son that would give her the power that she wanted as her husband had tragically died of a heart attack (it was said beneath her creamy thighs, and more joked that it was a pleasurable way to be assassinated, if so!). But then... the late Duke's cousin had stripped the Electorship out of her pretty hands. There was somewhat of a WAR going on within the House of Hapsburg-Portainne, and by the looks of it, Aurelia had come to do battle.The duchess was dressed in a gown that showed off her features well and was tailored to catch a man's eyes and make them follow. Her golden hair was dressed ornately and swept away from her face so no one would be able to miss its flawless beauties. She held the hands of each of her small children as she came forward to the Emperor, took center stage... and allowed her eyes to meet his for a moment, hot, flirtatious -- and then bow her head as she courtsied.Her children followed suit. \"Your Imperial Highness,\" she murmured, and rose again. She dipped down to her young son, the current Duke of Hapsburg-Portainne, and whispered something in his ear. The cherubim came forward and up the stairs toward the Emperor, and it was obvious what he was doing.Clutched tightly in one hand was a golden stag, with green gems for eyes. It was an ornate and beautiful statue, and it was a gift.\"Congratulations, my...\" The little voice spoke to the Emperor, and he seemed to forget the words. He turned back to his mother with concern eached on his darling face, and she smiled and urged him to go on.\"My... Lord...\" he said.It was the wrong word, but the way he rushed it out and ran back to his mother got an \"Awww\" from the crowd. Regardless of the Duchess' reputation, her children looked like little angels that could easily melt hearts.While their mother broke them.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The woman who was next called forward to greet the new Emperor of Vessia had a... reputation... to put it lightly. She had been from a lowborn noble house, but she had been exquisite at court, so it is said. Where the former Emperor had wanted to make her a mistress, the Duke of Hapsburg-Portainne had wanted to make her a wife, and so he had."}, "post-56778": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480294410000", "message": "The Emperor grinned upon seeing the person of... interesting repute approach him. He put one arm perpendicular to the direction of his legs at stomach height, resting the other arm on it and in turn resting his chin on it's hand. He was very curious as to what she would want. He grinned even wider when she got closer and he saw how she was dressed. She was trying to infatuate him, how cute. It was a good attempt at deviousness but he was older than he looked and could control himself very, very well. He almost laughed until... he saw that she brought her children along. Perhaps he had underestimated her just a little. Emperor Rexus took the small statuette gingerly and then motioned for a Guard to bring a small table on which to set it, which he did. He then stood up and came forth, squatting in front of the child who he was most likely thrice as tall as when standing, especially with his ceremonial armour on. He smiled to the child, perhaps the first honest smile he had in decades. The man realised that the kid may have been blinded by just how shiny his teeth were so he smiled a little less openly but still with his heart. \"Would you like a chance to sit in the Throne?\" he asked, to a choking noise from one of his Guards. He wanted to get the kid out of the way and have a chat with his mother, not wholly keeping up with her family politics and not sure if she or he cousin would have had the vote in the last Election. Regardless, it was the exact kind of personality that he liked.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor grinned upon seeing the person of... interesting repute approach him. He put one arm perpendicular to the direction of his legs at stomach height, resting the other arm on it and in turn resting his chin on it's hand. He was very curious as to what she would want. He grinned even wider when she got closer and he saw how she was dressed. She was trying to infatuate him, how cute. It was a good attempt at deviousness but he was older than he looked and could control himself very, very well. He almost laughed until... he saw that she brought her children along. Perhaps he had underestimated her just a little. Emperor Rexus took the small statuette gingerly and then motioned for a Guard to bring a small table on which to set it, which he did. He then stood up and came forth, squatting in front of the child who he was most likely thrice as tall as when standing, especially with his ceremonial armour on. He smiled to the child, perhaps the first honest smile he had in decades. The man realised that the kid may have been blinded by just how shiny his teeth were so he smiled a little less openly but still with his heart. \"Would you like a chance to sit in the Throne?\" he asked, to a choking noise from one of his Guards. He wanted to get the kid out of the way and have a chat with his mother, not wholly keeping up with her family politics and not sure if she or he cousin would have had the vote in the last Election. Regardless, it was the exact kind of personality that he liked.\u00a0"}, "post-56787": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480298177000", "message": "\"I am glad for that... Trust that... More than you know, my friend. He is just very... Unsettling to be around. That is all. I am not sure what it is.\" She gave a glance over her shoulder, knowing that there were many questions she would have to ask. She gave a smile to her friend and said, \"I am sure that it would be nice to seethe horses. We have some new goals that were just birthed recently. They are going to be ready to train for riding soon, and are quite handsome. My father said a few of them shall be for part of my dowry.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I am glad for that... Trust that... More than you know, my friend. He is just very... Unsettling to be around. That is all. I am not sure what it is.\" She gave a glance over her shoulder, knowing that there were many questions she would have to ask. She gave a smile to her friend and said, \"I am sure that it would be nice to seethe horses. We have some new goals that were just birthed recently. They are going to be ready to train for riding soon, and are quite handsome. My father said a few of them shall be for part of my dowry.\""}, "post-56794": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480303510000", "message": "The Duchess watched the new Emperor move with her pale blue eyes, a little smile on her lips as he unfolded himself and walked down to their level. She was much smaller than him, much, but she wouldn't allow herself to be intimidated.Her six year old daughter stared up at him with open awe, and the dukeling hid himself in the skirts of her gown until he crouched down to be closer to their level. Aurelia's hand was stroking over the young Duke's hair, her other hand on the back of her daughter who was also pressed into her skirts.Wide-eyed, the young child nodded his head quickly and passionately, looking between the Emperor and the throne with obvious need to get onto the chair. Her daughter gasped. \"I would like to sit upon the throne, too, Lord!\" the girl said, her blonde hair in ringlets that bounced around her darling face.\"Sh, Capris,\" Aurelia said gently to her, and then turned her long-lashed gaze back onto the Emperor.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Duchess watched the new Emperor move with her pale blue eyes, a little smile on her lips as he unfolded himself and walked down to their level. She was much smaller than him, much, but she wouldn't allow herself to be intimidated."}, "post-56801": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480306061000", "message": "\"Perhaps my brother would be interested in purchasing a few,\" Catalina confided, and her gaze continued to watch Cerridwyn's face. She paused in her walk and turned to Cerri, lowering her voice. \"I will try to convince him for a visit. We're traveling every other which place from here to Glaucia, I'm sure we could fit in a visit.\" Catalina flashed a smile at Cerridwyn, but the smile seemed to fade.\"Truly, Cerri, it's as if you've seen a ghost. Tell me. Is it something about the Archduke, truly?\" She looked up and glanced around to see if the Archduke was nearby. From all accounts, he seemed an excellent host and a charming man, but like Cerridwyn, Catalina had a feeling about him as well. \"Is it your father trying to betrothe you two?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Perhaps my brother would be interested in purchasing a few,\" Catalina confided, and her gaze continued to watch Cerridwyn's face. She paused in her walk and turned to Cerri, lowering her voice. \"I will try to convince him for a visit. We're traveling every other which place from here to Glaucia, I'm sure we could fit in a visit.\" Catalina flashed a smile at Cerridwyn, but the smile seemed to fade."}, "post-56806": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480311565000", "message": "She licked her lips. Dare she even say it? Oh, but the poor girl was obsessing about this and probably would for weeks to come. \"I don't think he is silly enough to believe there is a chance the Archduke would ever marry me. My family is not as high up as what he would marry. I have some questions in my heart right now is all... Today was the first time I've ever gotten enough of a look at his face to even feel what I do... And I do not mean infatuation or fawning.\"She lowered her voice even more, eyes wide, \"I don't know what to think, Cat.\" And then louder, \"We've got horses bred as warhorses, carriage horses, and work horses. I am sure your brother will find whatever his heart desires.\" Hey, maybe he could offer for Cerri, he would be a much more suitable suitor, aye?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She licked her lips. Dare she even say it? Oh, but the poor girl was obsessing about this and probably would for weeks to come. \"I don't think he is silly enough to believe there is a chance the Archduke would ever marry me. My family is not as high up as what he would marry. I have some questions in my heart right now is all... Today was the first time I've ever gotten enough of a look at his face to even feel what I do... And I do not mean infatuation or fawning.\""}, "post-56856": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480371087000", "message": "The Emperor shifted himself to the girl and after giving her a stern stare smiled once more. \"Of course.\" he said, to a cough from his other Guard. \"Now what do we say?\" he asked the both of them. Once they presumably thanked him he would watch them go to his seat and would let his gaze drift back to the Duchess. \"Children, future of the Emperor are they not?\" the man asked their mother. Finally turning his whole body to Aurelia he sized up the person before him, squinting and putting on a mask of perfect impassiveness. When finished he let his head drift to a more or less resting position with a lazy smile. \"So, Duchess Aurelia, what is it you wish from your Emperor today?\" he said. Rather than the honest and earnest face he presented the children, this one was much more aware, cautious and interested. If the woman he was speaking to was the deceitful puller of strings her reputation made her out to be, he was very much looking forward to what she may have to say. While she dressed like an ornament or at best a trophy, she was supposedly much more. \"Oh my manners, where are they! Speaking with the Lords has made me forget how to behave with the Ladies.\" He bowed and as he began his torso's rise his hand extended to take her's and give it a kiss. He still was not sure if she would try to use lust as a weapon against him, but he hoped she would if only to see her face when the dawning realisation came that it would not work.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor shifted himself to the girl and after giving her a stern stare smiled once more. \"Of course.\" he said, to a cough from his other Guard. \"Now what do we say?\" he asked the both of them. Once they presumably thanked him he would watch them go to his seat and would let his gaze drift back to the Duchess. \"Children, future of the Emperor are they not?\" the man asked their mother. Finally turning his whole body to Aurelia he sized up the person before him, squinting and putting on a mask of perfect impassiveness. When finished he let his head drift to a more or less resting position with a lazy smile. \"So, Duchess Aurelia, what is it you wish from your Emperor today?\" he said. Rather than the honest and earnest face he presented the children, this one was much more aware, cautious and interested. If the woman he was speaking to was the deceitful puller of strings her reputation made her out to be, he was very much looking forward to what she may have to say. While she dressed like an ornament or at best a trophy, she was supposedly much more. \"Oh my manners, where are they! Speaking with the Lords has made me forget how to behave with the Ladies.\" He bowed and as he began his torso's rise his hand extended to take her's and give it a kiss. He still was not sure if she would try to use lust as a weapon against him, but he hoped she would if only to see her face when the dawning realisation came that it would not work.\u00a0"}, "post-56916": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480436009000", "message": "Aurelia glanced over her shoulder at the way the rest of the court seemed to be watching the goings-on between the Emperor and her children. It made a little smile tick at the corner of her lush mouth, her lashes lowering to hide the little bit of triumph in her beautiful silver-blue eyes. Her children, in their sweet voices, told the Emperor his thanks, and by the time Aleksander's eyes drifted back to the duchess, her gaze also lifted to strike against his.\"Indeed,\" she answered him. She was petite beside him, although of an average height for a woman. His towering height no doubt showed him a wealth of her smooth skin and the swells of her breasts above the bodice of her fashionable gown, her graceful shoulders, her slender neck that displayed that place where here feminine jaw met her throat -- where, for a man who knew, there was a place just beneath her skin that could make her heart kick up and a sigh slip her lips if a man were but to kiss it, caress it.She blushed -- very prettily -- when he asked what she wished from the Emperor. \"You've already granted it, Your Imperial Highness,\" she told him. \"I'll admit it, I was concerned about the reputation you've fostered for yourself. A man of your stature, of your accomplishments...\" Her eyes dropped to his ceremonial armor, and then swept to look at her children sitting in the throne, giggling and laughing and giving mock orders from where they sat in their angelic voices. \"I was worried you might dismiss my children. But, I was wrong. I should apologize, Your Imperial Highness.\" And her gaze lifted back up to Aleksander's to strike against his -- it was heated, it was challenging, it was a suggestion or perhaps a promise. One wouldn't know until one dove deeper.Yet, she never tried to touch him. She never tried to decrease the distance between them. It was he that reached for her, and she gave him her hand, dwarfed in his own, her skin like warm satin. He kiss brushed over her hand, and Aurelia laughed a little at his playfulness.\"Mama!\" cried her daughter, jumping off the throne with spirited energy and running across the distance toward the Emperor and the Duchess, her blonde curls bouncing, her blue eyes bright and pretty. Perhaps she'd one day be as beautiful as her mother after all.\"Capris, your manners,\" the Duchess lightly admonished as her daughter threw herself into her skirts and held onto them. Aurelia reached down and gently pulled the fists from them.\"I'm sorry, Mama, Lord,\" she said to the Emperor. Aurelia glanced at him. \"We are still working on the correct address to Imperial Majesties,\" Aurelia said with a soft laugh.The Dukeling was struggling to get off the throne, but there was determination set to his face as he inched off the edge and plopped, losing his balance and falling on his rump, making a warm laugh ripple from the crowd before he chased after his sister. Capris was looking up at Aurelia with open honesty.\"Can Lord come home with us for Wintertide?\" she asked. The Dukeling gasped with excitement and clapped his hands. \"Wintertide, Wintertide!\"Aurelia shared a glance with the Emperor and then dropped down, her skirts swaying away from her as she looked at her children. \"My darlings, he is the Emperor of all of Vessia--\"\"ALL of Vessia?\" said the Dukeling, his eyes wide as he turned to look up at Aleksander with worshipful eyes.\"All of Vessia, yes. He is a very, very busy man. We will invite him, of course,\" the duchess said, and she also turned her gaze up to Aleksander, \"for there is nothing more that we would love than to entertain him for Wintertide,\" and her gaze turned back to her daughter and son, \"but we mustn't be disappointed if he tells us no.\"Immediately the children turned to the Emperor, and although they didn't throw themselves against his legs as they had their mother, they still looked up at him with their faces. \"Please, Lord? Please! May you come to Wintertide? I shall show you my collections of horses,\" begged Capris. \"And my soldiers!\" added Dareion. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Aurelia glanced over her shoulder at the way the rest of the court seemed to be watching the goings-on between the Emperor and her children. It made a little smile tick at the corner of her lush mouth, her lashes lowering to hide the little bit of triumph in her beautiful silver-blue eyes. Her children, in their sweet voices, told the Emperor his thanks, and by the time Aleksander's eyes drifted back to the duchess, her gaze also lifted to strike against his."}, "post-56971": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480454329000", "message": "He did not budge when she said that having entered his court was her granted wish, but he did finally blink when she mentioned his reputation. \"What, pray, have you heard of me?\" he asked, genuinely curious. While the Rexus family were of both old, and high nobility, they tended to be secretive and keep to themselves. When she apologised he waved a hand dismissively, in fact a little confused by it. \"They're wonderful children. I insist on knowing, why would I dismiss your children? Although I must say you bringing them was an... interesting move.\" When they made eye-contact, he hoped the Duchess wasn't actually paying attention to his eyes and was just making a maneuver; if she was then he knew his almost certainly dilated pupils would be noticed, one of the few parts of facial expression he had no control over.\u00a0He was glad for the interruption of the children, Aurelia being the fourth person who could make Rexus break his stare and he felt... odd when he did. He had a special place in his heart for children. While he was quite the cold murderer, those he deemed young, impressionable and still relatively pure where those he truly liked. Despite everything, he did not get along with them particularly well although that may have been due to the rather grotesque way of life he had led previously. He once more lowered himself to the height of the children, this time with a kneel upon his right leg. He could not go around the country visiting all the children, but he supposed that these were the children he had seen and thus given his mental obligation to. \"I'll tell you this. I will come and visit if you promise to behave, and be a good citizen of the Empire.\" He shot their mother a wink, with the same uncertain implications as the look she gave him earlier. \u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He did not budge when she said that having entered his court was her granted wish, but he did finally blink when she mentioned his reputation. \"What, pray, have you heard of me?\" he asked, genuinely curious. While the Rexus family were of both old, and high nobility, they tended to be secretive and keep to themselves. When she apologised he waved a hand dismissively, in fact a little confused by it. \"They're wonderful children. I insist on knowing, why would I dismiss your children? Although I must say you bringing them was an... interesting move.\" When they made eye-contact, he hoped the Duchess wasn't actually paying attention to his eyes and was just making a maneuver; if she was then he knew his almost certainly dilated pupils would be noticed, one of the few parts of facial expression he had no control over.\u00a0"}, "post-56984": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480458760000", "message": "Aurelia frowned a little, her gaze becoming concerned as they talked whilst the children played. \"Your Highness, I did not mean to imply torrid gossip. During the elections, you made quite an impression upon all peoples. Some people found qualities they admired, and some that caused them hesitancy.\" She looked up at him as they spoke, standing a few feet away from his throne, a handsome man and a handsome woman, both trying to figure out what the other wanted on little information. \"Ambition is an attribute that people can be so fickle about. In some, it is a measure of greatness. In others, a measure of deviousness. I find the truth to be somewhere in between, and like you have proven to me today with your kindness and your honesty, I cannot rely merely on what is said by others.\"She apologized then for even doubting or believing and he waved her off to compliment her on her children. She smiled in their direction, a warm and beautiful thing as their joyous laughter bubbled from their cherubic faces. \"Interesting?\" She asked and looked back at him. \"I suppose, but my son is the rightful Duke of Hapsburg-Portainne. It is his duty to greet the Emperor of Vessia. I would be a poor steward if I let him be remiss,\" she laughed.The children came over and made their pleas, and then the Emperor was crouching down as Aurelia did. With his blonde hair, her golden, and the blondeness of the two children, well...... they made quite the handsome family. He winked at her as the children errupted in celebration, and Aurelia smiled back at him before she turned to take her children in hand.\"Darlings, darlings. Remember your manners,\" she said to them as she stood and took them by the hand. \"We must say farewell to the Emperor now. Let us curtsy and His Grace will bow...\" Aurelia sank into the graceful action, with Capris trying her best, and the Duke bowing but staring up at the Emperor as he did so. \"Until Wintertide, Your Highness,\" she murmured to him, and she walked past him -- without invitation to meet her later, to inquire as to where she was staying -- with her children beside her.They continued off and through the corridors of the palace to their large suite, and her children looked up at her. \"Did we do well, Mama? Did we ask the right questions?\" They asked once they were far from the Hall.\"Yes, my darlings. You did very well.\" She smiled as they entered their suite and the door quietly closed behind them.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Aurelia frowned a little, her gaze becoming concerned as they talked whilst the children played. \"Your Highness, I did not mean to imply torrid gossip. During the elections, you made quite an impression upon all peoples. Some people found qualities they admired, and some that caused them hesitancy.\" "}, "post-57002": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480469175000", "message": "The Emperor sighed with relief but then quickly stopped the action. Surely he was not embarrassed by what a single Duchess could know about him, if she even did? He listened to what she had to say, trying his best to maintain the grin he always had prior. His eyes and smile narrowed as she winked back. So it begins, he thought. He watched them go chuckling a little. He did not know if he would be able to come, but he would try his best.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor sighed with relief but then quickly stopped the action. Surely he was not embarrassed by what a single Duchess could know about him, if she even did? He listened to what she had to say, trying his best to maintain the grin he always had prior. His eyes and smile narrowed as she winked back. "}, "post-57018": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480481543000", "message": "She raised her voice so Cerri's father could hear. \"Perhaps a pretty palfrey? My brother is looking to replace my current steed.\" She feigned interest in the topic, and then lowered her voice again.\"Cerri, you keep speaking in riddles. Spit it out! What is concerning you?\" She looked up again and a few noblemen were looking in their direction. They were pretty women, of course, if not very high up on the food chain. Cat smiled politely but stiffly, not making herself approachable before her gaze swept back onto Cerridwyn.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She raised her voice so Cerri's father could hear. \"Perhaps a pretty palfrey? My brother is looking to replace my current steed.\" She feigned interest in the topic, and then lowered her voice again."}, "post-57026": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480487354000", "message": "\"I know of a very proud Palfry,\" she said, then sighed.\"This is not the place to speak of the matter. I'll not have gossip spreading because someone overheard our conversation.\" She glanced toward the men in question, following suit with a polite smile. It was Cat's brother who caught her eye next, she watched him for a moment, expression softening a little. Someone like him, closer to her age, would do much better. She hurriedly looked away before he could catch her admiring him. And hopefully Cat would not comment.Cerri looked at her friend as if nothing out of the ordinary had happened, brows raised some. \"Why is it that we're expected to marry young but the men can take their sweet time?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I know of a very proud Palfry,\" she said, then sighed."}, "post-57109": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480563413000", "message": "Catalina missed the look of longing Cerridwyn sent toward Ruther, who was speaking with some of the other nobles in line. He had a habit of doing that -- making friends wherever he went. It served him well. People tended to forgive Ruther for the sins of his father given how charming the young lord was himself.The world was his oyster, which was all the more ironic for Catalina. The world was her cage, in ways that Cerridwyn wouldn't be able to comprehend.\"It's unfair. But then, so much is,\" Catalina sighed with a lift of her shoulders. \"Catalina,\" it was the sound of Ruther calling to her.Catalina glanced over her shoulder, and then back at Cerridwyn. \"Speaking of expectations to marry, I'm sure this is mine. I'll see you soon, Cerri. I'll make my brother visit.\" She brushed a kiss on Cerri's cheek and then drifted back toward Ruther so he could introduce her to the men he was speaking to.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Catalina missed the look of longing Cerridwyn sent toward Ruther, who was speaking with some of the other nobles in line. He had a habit of doing that -- making friends wherever he went. It served him well. People tended to forgive Ruther for the sins of his father given how charming the young lord was himself."}, "post-57121": {"user": "Cerridwyn von Heschburg", "user_num": 1957, "timestamp": "1480568188000", "message": "\"Be well, Cat!\" She said and returned the gesture. She returned to where her father was standing and sighed for he was engaged in conversation with another man, this one ancient... She suffered through another meeting. Finally, it seemed like nobody else was coming forward.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Be well, Cat!\" She said and returned the gesture. She returned to where her father was standing and sighed for he was engaged in conversation with another man, this one ancient... She suffered through another meeting. Finally, it seemed like nobody else was coming forward."}, "post-57196": {"user": "Adrian von Heschburg", "user_num": 643, "timestamp": "1480631615000", "message": "His chains clanked in the torrential rain, and a combined cacophony of metal bindings filled the courtyard as imperial knights led Adrian and other collaborators to a section of the palace to contain them.  Blood from the slain Wickans still stained his imperial surcoat, and his chainmail still battered from battle.  \"The Massacre at Arburg\" the locals were already calling it.  But what did they know?  Adrian and these other knights being led through this very courtyard were victims of dastardly crimes committed by those filthy pagans - their homes burned, daughters raped, sons stolen, and wives butchered.  It was human nature to take revenge, or so the young Adrian thought.  So it was no wonder why Adrian and his allies followed an angry Konrad IV into Eastwick and put to the sword hundreds of Wickans at Arburg.  But they didn't know.They didn't know.Adrian walked steadily through the courtyard, the first time in many years.  Upright, at attention, and as alert as possible -  a first impression was important, especially since he was the first actual Knight-Brother to come to the palace since the Brothers' victory in Eastwick.  He was not only here to represent himself, but the Audrian Order as well; surely the Emperor would inquire about the crusaders' exploits.Adrian would request permission to speak to the Emperor, and when he was given the opportunity, the Knight-Brother would walk into the room, place his fist on his chest, bow nobly and greet him:\"Guten tag, mein Kaiser.\"  Adrian would put his hands behind his back and walk forth.  \"Allow me to introduce myself.  I am Komtur Adrian von Heschburg, Brother of the Audrian Order.  I hailed from Heschburg, and would have been Count had it not been sacked by the Wickans.  I served in Swavia, under the banner of the Vessian Empire.  I admit I participated in the Arburg Massacre, and I was willing to accept my punishment.  I took the mantle of the Black Cross, and I have served faithfully and diligently since my acceptance.  With the Wickan and Eastern Crusades over, I return now to the Fatherland to serve my Empire until the end of my days.  I stand ready for you to command, Kaiser.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<i>His chains clanked in the torrential rain, and a combined cacophony of metal bindings filled the courtyard as imperial knights led Adrian and other collaborators to a section of the palace to contain them.  Blood from the slain Wickans still stained his imperial surcoat, and his chainmail still battered from battle.  \"The Massacre at Arburg\" the locals were already calling it.  But what did they know?  Adrian and these other knights being led through this very courtyard were victims of dastardly crimes committed by those filthy pagans - their homes burned, daughters raped, sons stolen, and wives butchered.  It was human nature to take revenge, or so the young Adrian thought.  So it was no wonder why Adrian and his allies followed an angry Konrad IV into Eastwick and put to the sword hundreds of Wickans at Arburg.  But they didn't know.<br><br/>They didn't know.</br></i>"}, "post-57211": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480642932000", "message": "She was bored. The ceremony with the Emperor droning on and on about glory this and glory that... Boring. The people vying to sell their daughters to old men? Boring. She rolled her eyes and sighed as her father became one of them until she said, \"At least let him be young and handsome, father. I'd die of boredom with an old man!\" Of course, she was probably the only daughter allowed to talk to her father that way. He adored her, she had Duke Almus Artorius wrapped around her pinky. Even above his heir, Almus II, who was currently touring the Empire in search of his own Bride in the name of love. Hah!Then her father asked for an Audience with the Emperor, and she wad to be presented to him. He was a big supporter of the emperor, but she could not care less. As they waited, she sized up only the good looking, richer nobles who could possibly keep up with her greed and vanity. She smile prettily at one or two who interested her.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was bored. The ceremony with the Emperor droning on and on about glory this and glory that... Boring. The people vying to sell their daughters to old men? Boring. She rolled her eyes and sighed as her father became one of them until she said, \"At least let him be young and handsome, father. I'd die of boredom with an old man!\" Of course, she was probably the only daughter allowed to talk to her father that way. He adored her, she had Duke Almus Artorius wrapped around her pinky. Even above his heir, Almus II, who was currently touring the Empire in search of his own Bride in the name of love. Hah!"}, "post-57214": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480644110000", "message": "Adrian would be paused for a few Guards who wanted to chat him up. They pointed to him that some other noble wanted and audience with the Emperor now anyway.\u00a0Duke Artorius would be brought before the Emperor, and allowed to say whatever it was he wanted.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Adrian would be paused for a few Guards who wanted to chat him up. They pointed to him that some other noble wanted and audience with the Emperor now anyway.\u00a0"}, "post-57215": {"user": "Archduke Isenbardus", "user_num": 1965, "timestamp": "1480644672000", "message": "The Archduke took note of Lady Ceres as she was looking around the room. He had heard rumors about the girl and some of the escapades she had been in. Although he appreciated more independent women, from what he had heard, Lady Ceres was simply just on the immature side. Fixing his gaze on her, he clearly studied Ceres, looking her up and down like a butcher might a piece of meat. After a few seconds of this, he shrugged to himself and turned around, starting a conversation with a rather richly dressed lord. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Archduke took note of Lady Ceres as she was looking around the room. He had heard rumors about the girl and some of the escapades she had been in. Although he appreciated more independent women, from what he had heard, Lady Ceres was simply just on the immature side. Fixing his gaze on her, he clearly studied Ceres, looking her up and down like a butcher might a piece of meat. After a few seconds of this, he shrugged to himself and turned around, starting a conversation with a rather richly dressed lord. "}, "post-57218": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480645517000", "message": "She caught the gaze of the Archduke as her father was praising the Emperor up and down, promising to have plenty of gold to give him and line his coffers, promising every eligible young man for his cause, etc... With a request to help find a young man with a good family and lofty title for his daughter. She moved closer as she promised and gave a very pretty curtsy, smiling at him and murmuring, \"Your imperial Majesty.\" But her eyes found the Archduke again and she narrowed his eyes at his shrug. What was that supposed to mean?!", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She caught the gaze of the Archduke as her father was praising the Emperor up and down, promising to have plenty of gold to give him and line his coffers, promising every eligible young man for his cause, etc... With a request to help find a young man with a good family and lofty title for his daughter. She moved closer as she promised and gave a very pretty curtsy, smiling at him and murmuring, \"Your imperial Majesty.\" But her eyes found the Archduke again and she narrowed his eyes at his shrug. What was that supposed to mean?!"}, "post-57228": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480646925000", "message": "Adrian von Heschburg  was soon led to the Emperor who stood up at the sight of him but promptly sat back down. \"Adrian von Heschburg, yes? I presume you have a lot to say about your... time out there. I am very interested in the state of the world outside Vessia.\"\u00a0", "link_list": ["/user/643"], "image_list": [], "html": "<span itemscope=\"\" itemtype=\"http://schema.org/Person\"><a class=\"user-link js-user-link user-643 group-0\" href=\"/user/643\" itemprop=\"url\" title=\"@adrian\"><span itemprop=\"name\">Adrian von Heschburg</span></a></span>"}, "post-57235": {"user": "Queen Ruza Rapinett", "user_num": 1993, "timestamp": "1480649925000", "message": "Queen Ruza strolled about, glancing at the other lords and ladies as they discussed their various plans. She wore a haughty look, a look those familiar with her knew to be the resting expression of her face. Everyone was far too delicate, dancing around the real issues. Not that she didn\u2019t do such things as well when forced, but it always pained her and she avoided it when possible. But these nobles acted that way perpetually!If she had the power, she would change the court's infuriating way of doing business, but that tradition ran strong. She doubted anyone had the power to change it, even the most well liked of Emperors. Ruza intended to speak to the Emperor, although she planned to wait until most of the rabble was finished scraping and begging to him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Queen Ruza strolled about, glancing at the other lords and ladies as they discussed their various plans. She wore a haughty look, a look those familiar with her knew to be the resting expression of her face. Everyone was far too delicate, dancing around the real issues. Not that she didn\u2019t do such things as well when forced, but it always pained her and she avoided it when possible. But these nobles acted that way perpetually!"}, "post-57258": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480660672000", "message": "As soon as she was free, she tried to get a closer look at the Grand Duke... Did he really just shrug at her? She huffed and  said to herself, \"He must be daft. Hmph.\" She was definitely butt hurt. No, really! Her nose was out of joint. Why, the nerve of him! She stamped her slippered foot in tantrum, then whirled around, rudely bumping into people on her way to getting to her father again. She ignored the angry protests of some, then pushed one girl, Cerridwyn whoever SHE was that rivaled her in beauty, with both hands. \"You're in my way! Tch, ugh!\"Then she stormed up to her father and tried to get his attention as he was speaking to some lesser lordling and enjoying himself. \"Father, I want to leave.\" He waved her off, and she stamped her foot again, \"Tch, ugh! FAH-THURRRRAH! I want to leeeeave! NOWWWWWauh!\" Such petulance! She was mortified at being simply shrugged at by the Arch Duke!", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As soon as she was free, she tried to get a closer look at the Grand Duke... Did he really just shrug at her? She huffed and  said to herself, \"He must be daft. Hmph.\" She was definitely butt hurt. No, really! Her nose was out of joint. Why, the nerve of him! She stamped her slippered foot in tantrum, then whirled around, rudely bumping into people on her way to getting to her father again. She ignored the angry protests of some, then pushed one girl, Cerridwyn whoever SHE was that rivaled her in beauty, with both hands. \"You're in my way! Tch, ugh!\""}, "post-57284": {"user": "Queen Ruza Rapinett", "user_num": 1993, "timestamp": "1480712147000", "message": "What Ruza really needed at this moment was a drink. She\u2019d definitely find one after she spoke to the Emperor. Although many lords eyed her surreptitiously, for now they stayed back, her reputation being well known. Lady Ceres slight meltdown drew Ruza\u2019s gaze, causing her to shake her head in disdain as Ceres pestered her father. Brats like there were ranked highly in those who Ruza despised.At least most peasants children were taught to be courteous around the nobility, but it seemed many children of the nobility hadn\u2019t been taught any manners. Tsking loudly, Ruza walked past Ceres, speaking loudly enough those nearby could easily hear her.\u201cDespite knowing full well what to expect, I\u2019m always surprised by how many brats are invited to these events. Perhaps the new Emperor will make a list to exclude such individuals from future gatherings...\u201dRuza didn\u2019t address anyone in particular as she said this, simply speaking what she was currently thinking, something she was infamous for doing. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "What Ruza really needed at this moment was a drink. She\u2019d definitely find one after she spoke to the Emperor. Although many lords eyed her surreptitiously, for now they stayed back, her reputation being well known. Lady Ceres slight meltdown drew Ruza\u2019s gaze, causing her to shake her head in disdain as Ceres pestered her father. Brats like there were ranked highly in those who Ruza despised."}, "post-57287": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1480714144000", "message": "She overheard this and whirled around to snarl at the woman who dared to speak of her in such a way. The spoiled woman looked at the other and said, \"Old hags who fool themselves into thinking they should be here looking for a husband still, ought not speak such words.\" And that is when her father finally piped up, \" Ceres! You go too far!!! Hold your wicked tongue! You shall go, but you shall be going home. You are not to attend the masque! Furthermore, I invite her majesty to fetch you for a week so she can teach you some humility!\"She gasped and opened her mouth in protest, about to argue until he grabbed her arm, and after he apologized to Ruza before hauling the brat out.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She overheard this and whirled around to snarl at the woman who dared to speak of "}, "post-57289": {"user": "Adrian von Heschburg", "user_num": 643, "timestamp": "1480715940000", "message": "Adrian walked over and sat down across from Emperor Rexus Aleksander.  \"I'll tell you what I know, mein Kaiser,\" Adrian told the Emperor.  \"I was tasked with commanding a garrison at a place called the Free City - now known as Isra.  A large, bustling city - a hub of the continent, so to speak, with a high population.  Then there was Medan, a decent kingdom, but it fell under the control of the Goraians.  There's the Gauldish folk, from their lands of Gauldin; similar to Vessia, I would think.  There was Alba, recently wrested free by its king.  And Aozora - a land of refugees.\"  Adrian nodded his head wearily.  \"Those are the most important locations, and the only ones the Empire might be concerned with.\"\"To the east of Isra some Wickan refugees gathered newfound allies.  So Konrad and the Brothers banded together and drove them away.  Konrad established the Duchy of Audria there, installing the Duchess Audrey von Hepburn.\"  The Duchy had been doing well ever since, and making regular tributes to its parent nation: Vessia.  \"Konrad secularized, married Audrey, and some Brothers followed suit.  The rest of us tried to find new meaning, but we've been down on our luck.  So I led the Brothers here, to Vessia, in the hopes we might serve the Vaterland once more.\"", "link_list": ["/user/1958"], "image_list": [], "html": "Adrian walked over and sat down across from "}, "post-57301": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480719547000", "message": "The Emperor intently listened to the words of Adrian. He was a man of interesting repute and life. Lord Rexus stood up and paced about before turning to the man. \"You seem to have done... relatively well. It is my first day as Emperor so as you can imagine I am not fully instated but I have the basics of our country, and what is done with you. Audria is secure and now we have pseudo-foreign allies, even if under our eye.\" he said, sitting down once more. \"There is an expedition being organised to go into Swavia once more. It is still in the making, but I think it will soon be changed to be suiting to both your role as a soldier and as a Holy Knight.\" he said, with a tap to his nose to make it very clear he was hinting to Adrian it was to be a Crusade.\u00a0He smiled, stroking his blond hair. He did not have his usual devious smile but a kinder stately smile. \"There is also the matter of your nobility and title. You have 'von' within your name and a Knight of your Order but I feel more is needed. Lord Adrian, Swavia is in need of new leadership since the previous Protospatharius of it is missing, probably ran off into the East with his riches. You however seem like a man of honour, and actual strength rather than boasting. I will grant you the title of Count regardless, but in conjunction with Protospatharius you will be so much... more. Take my offer now, I do not have time to sit here convincing you. Your brothers shall be Organized along with you, the Audrian Angelist Order Knights being sent there with you to fortify and root out the barbarians. Your role in the coming conflict will be effective immediately. Within a week or two you will be sent to Swavia, to soften up the region for the arrival of the main force; I fear without you the garrisons levies and few noble Knights there cannot hold out for our relief without having our economy ruined for a good time. Do well, and you may rise even further.\" he said, hoping he had hook line and sinker present.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor intently listened to the words of Adrian. He was a man of interesting repute and life. Lord Rexus stood up and paced about before turning to the man. \"You seem to have done... relatively well. It is my first day as Emperor so as you can imagine I am not fully instated but I have the basics of our country, and what is done with you. Audria is secure and now we have pseudo-foreign allies, even if under our eye.\" he said, sitting down once more. \"There is an expedition being organised to go into Swavia once more. It is still in the making, but I think it will soon be changed to be suiting to both your role as a soldier and as a Holy Knight.\" he said, with a tap to his nose to make it very clear he was hinting to Adrian it was to be a Crusade.\u00a0"}, "post-57303": {"user": "Adrian von Heschburg", "user_num": 643, "timestamp": "1480720302000", "message": "The curiosity on Adrian's face was no doubt evident as soon as Emperor Rexus Aleksander  mentioned 'Swavia'.  It brought more dread and bad memories than curiosity, however.  Another rebellion?, he asked himself, mentally sighing.  But then the Emperor made it clear that something else was happening, sparking Adrian's curiosity even more.Then things started to get even more interesting.  Adrian may have been visibly surprised at his potential promotion to Protospatharius.  Adrian stood up.  \"Danke, mein Kaiser,\" he said quickly.  \"I will collect myself here and then make my way to Swavia to assume leadership.  I never thought I'd see more bloodshed spilled in Swavia, but if the Empire calls for it, then the Empire shall receive it.  My men - the Brothers, I mean - will most assuredly assist me there.  But I must beg the question: what can you tell me about Swavia's current forces?  And what kind of resistance can I expect?  I fear I am so far out of the loop on Vessia's current events, and I do not wish to rush in blind.\"", "link_list": ["/user/1958"], "image_list": [], "html": "The curiosity on Adrian's face was no doubt evident as soon as "}, "post-57375": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480789732000", "message": "The Emperor relaxed as Adrian accepted his new duty. \"Count Adrian, Swavia has only the single private regiment each noble is permitted and whatever levies they can muster, along with occasional clerical assistance and but one official Swavian regiment. It is but rabble but I think you are the one who can organise it into more than mere slayers of poorly armed tribals. You can make them hold their own while we wait for the rest of Vessia's armies to be mobilised.\"\u00a0Rexus rubbed his neck wearily, sniffing the air a few times. \"Oh yes, there is going to be a ball of some sort for my inauguration later, the details of which will be given slightly later. Come, enjoy yourself. We may talk.\" Unless Adrian had something else to say he was dismissed; the Emperor was busy and he needed to talk to Adrian more privately anyway.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor relaxed as Adrian accepted his new duty. \"Count Adrian, Swavia has only the single private regiment each noble is permitted and whatever levies they can muster, along with occasional clerical assistance and but one official Swavian regiment. It is but rabble but I think you are the one who can organise it into more than mere slayers of poorly armed tribals. You can make them hold their own while we wait for the rest of Vessia's armies to be mobilised.\"\u00a0"}, "post-57377": {"user": "Adrian von Heschburg", "user_num": 643, "timestamp": "1480790923000", "message": "Adrian grinned in irony. \"There was a time when I trained those tribals.  Fierce, unrelenting, and determined, they were. Konrad pressed the men into service as auxiliaries, first to demoralize the enemy, and second because it decreased the amount of tribals we had to keep under control.\"Adrian stood up and prepared to leave. \"No matter. I'll make sure I straighten out the levies in Swavia, and do what I can to assist in the war effort. I bid you farewell, Kaiser.\"Adrian bowed as he left the room. Time for a new squire, he thought to himself. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Adrian grinned in irony. \"There was a time when I trained those tribals.  Fierce, unrelenting, and determined, they were. Konrad pressed the men into service as auxiliaries, first to demoralize the enemy, and second because it decreased the amount of tribals we had to keep under control.\""}, "post-57381": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480792377000", "message": "With Adrian gone, the Emperor was now open for his next audience.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "With Adrian gone, the Emperor was now open for his next audience.\u00a0"}, "post-57423": {"user": "Queen Ruza Rapinett", "user_num": 1993, "timestamp": "1480828919000", "message": "Queen Ruza simply laughed at Ceres outburst and the punishment that followed it by her father. It was so easily to anger nobles of that disposition. She always found it amusing to do so. \u201cThank you, Lord Artorius, for having the sense to discipline your child. Many of the nobles seem to have forgotten how to do that to their offspring. As for your offer, perhaps I shall take you up on that in the future. It might be a good character building exercise.\u201dHaving said her piece, Ruza noticed the Emperor had finally finished talking to the others in line. It seemed it was time for her to offer her congratulations. As she approached the Emperor, Ruza studied him intently. Information about this man was rather scarce, something which always sent off alarms for her. Although her expression was no longer haughty, she met his gaze levelly and made no motions to bow or curtsy to him.  \u201cI offer my congratulations to you, Emperor Rexus. It seems the majority of electors decided you were the best choice out of all the candidates this time, a decision I will support until I see proof to the contrary. I must say, however, I find it quite strange how little info my informants have been able to gather about you.\u201dThose who knew Ruza, would expect her to say something like this. Although she restrained herself more around the Emperor, she would still speak her mind, even if etiquette dictated it improper. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Queen Ruza simply laughed at Ceres outburst and the punishment that followed it by her father. It was so easily to anger nobles of that disposition. She always found it amusing to do so. "}, "post-57437": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480878921000", "message": "Humbly nodding upon the congratulation he could not help letting a chuckle escape his mouth when she brought up lack of knowledge regarding him. He raised a fist to his lips to slightly muffle the sound but then lowered it to grip his throne once more. \"Have you considered getting better spies?\" he said, just a little proud of himself. \"Regardless, surely everything you need to know about me and my family is in the peerage books? You don't think there is something I am hiding, do you?\" he asked, his smile getting wider every moment. \"I'm but a loyal noble of an old family, nothing to hide here.\" he supplied, as honestly as ever.\u00a0Shifting himself in his seat and putting his fist under his chin he stared for a few moments before continuing. \"Are you perhaps confused as to why I was voted for?\"\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Humbly nodding upon the congratulation he could not help letting a chuckle escape his mouth when she brought up lack of knowledge regarding him. He raised a fist to his lips to slightly muffle the sound but then lowered it to grip his throne once more. \"Have you considered getting better spies?\" he said, just a little proud of himself. \"Regardless, surely everything you need to know about me and my family is in the peerage books? You don't think there is something I am "}, "post-57468": {"user": "Queen Ruza Rapinett", "user_num": 1993, "timestamp": "1480909196000", "message": "Ruza walked around in little circles for a moment, considering the Emperor\u2019s answer to her. She had let out a rather dry laugh when he mentioned secrets. After a few seconds of silence, she responded, blunt as ever.\u201cMy informants are perfectly capable of gathering information. Them finding little information about your house doesn\u2019t cause me to question their skill. It makes me question why your house has gone to such lengths to ensure next to nothing, is known about it.\u201d\u201cDo I think you\u2019re hiding something? I will respond with a question of my own. Do you think I\u2019m already senile? Everyone in this room is hiding something, the question is whether it is something of importance. As you are the Emperor, I feel the answer to that question is most likely yes.\u201dAlthough she spoke directly and some might consider rudely, Ruza didn\u2019t appear angry as most nobles would if they said what she had. No, she simply liked removing the veil of court manners from her discussions. Her expression was neutral and her tone calm, her green eyes watching the Emperor with a hint of interest. \u201cWithout much info on you, I can only guess as to why you were selected by the electors. They generally select someone who they either truly believe will bring about another golden age, or who is so weak they will be nothing more than a puppet of the electors themselves, typically doing the latter. Regardless of my vague guesses, I\u2019m open to hearing your own opinion on the matter of why you were elected.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ruza walked around in little circles for a moment, considering the Emperor\u2019s answer to her. She had let out a rather dry laugh when he mentioned secrets. After a few seconds of silence, she responded, blunt as ever."}, "post-57513": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1480971520000", "message": "The Emperor raised an eye-brow at her reply. It was definitely unexpected. Most people spoke as if he could kill them at any moment, which while true, was often just a little exaggeratedly displayed in their speech. This was surprising to say the least. They way she persisted was also quite baffling. Every time he was about to clear his throat for a retort of his own his words were stopped once more. When the Queen had finished he made an arch of his hands to rest his chin upon, his elbows on his knees. He bit his lower lip, sizing up the person in front of him. A mind like that was dangerous to let wander, even if not all that powerful. Perhaps he should have paid a little more attention to the peerage, see who this noble with oddly coloured hair is.\u00a0After a minute of glaring and hoping the will of this person would break under his icy blue stare, Emperor Rexus sat up straight and put his arms back on his throne. \"You do not know that your spies are not slacking. Perhaps my information is ripe for the seizing, you simply hired inferior people to do your dirty work. Such certainty does a person no good. But let's talk about your age; you clearly do at least reasonable work to hide it, what with the dyed hair. You may in fact be senile, I have not ruled out the possibility. However, that is beside the point. Such 'clever' remarks do not go down well in court. We both know that when I asked if you believed I am hiding something I meant to ask if you believed I am hiding something deeply scandalous or extraordinary. Besides, it is not polite to respond to a question with a question.\" He took a break of a few milliseconds to lean back and put his hands behind his head to rest rather casually. \"I won't give my opinion, for really I do not have one. I am adamantly certain of why I was elected but I would rather not reveal it. Perhaps it is a hint to me being clever, or perhaps the Electors - my apparent masters - merely told me what to do.\" Emperor Aleksander let his hands flop back onto the rest on the throne, raising his right eyebrow curiously.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor raised an eye-brow at her reply. It was definitely unexpected. Most people spoke as if he could kill them at any moment, which while true, was often just a little exaggeratedly displayed in their speech. This was surprising to say the least. They way she persisted was also quite baffling. Every time he was about to clear his throat for a retort of his own his words were stopped once more. When the Queen had finished he made an arch of his hands to rest his chin upon, his elbows on his knees. He bit his lower lip, sizing up the person in front of him. A mind like that was dangerous to let wander, even if not all that powerful. Perhaps he should have paid a little more attention to the peerage, see who this noble with oddly coloured hair is.\u00a0"}, "post-57576": {"user": "Queen Ruza Rapinett", "user_num": 1993, "timestamp": "1480996490000", "message": "Ruza met the Emperor\u2019s glare with a sharp look of her own and refused to break eye contact with him. She had found over her years in court men of power were generally unsettled when a lady spoke to them in such a way and acted as aggressively as she did. It was something she had been taking advantage of for years, even if it left many damaged relationships. \u201cI do work quite a bit on keeping up my appearances, I will concede that to you, Emperor. That is one piece of information my informants were able to get, however\u2026 I can say with certainty I\u2019m certainly not the only one who is trying to look younger, wouldn\u2019t you agree?\u201d Her last comment was clearly a pointed one. At his mention of her being clever, Ruza couldn\u2019t help but let out a laugh, a genuine one at that. \u201cIf you haven\u2019t already heard the rumors about me that circulate, let me tell you myself, majesty. I don\u2019t give a damn about being polite or following the standard edicate of the court. The court is free to think what it wishes, but I believe it to be a complete sham and will treat it as such. The amount of useless pomp and ceremony it has followed simply because of \u2018tradition\u2019 is staggering.\u201dAlthough not yet truly angry, Ruza\u2019s voice did hold more hostility in it when she spoke of the court. \u201cI shall be taking my leave now. Hopefully, you will be your own Emperor and not a puppet of the court, but that will be apparent with time. Just remember, majesty, I have been truthful about my opinion of you. Beware the ones who came before me and told you what they thought you wished to hear. They have a way of attaching strings to you unnoticed until it's too late.\u201dThis last statement seemed surprisingly sincere, for Ruza was truly worried about the Emperor being a puppet of the court. Unless they Emperor had some reason he wished her to stay, Ruza would walk away and towards the exit of the palace. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ruza met the Emperor\u2019s glare with a sharp look of her own and refused to break eye contact with him. She had found over her years in court men of power were generally unsettled when a lady spoke to them in such a way and acted as aggressively as she did. It was something she had been taking advantage of for years, even if it left many damaged relationships. "}, "post-57606": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1481057282000", "message": "He would give an exaggerated \"haha\" upon her comment regarding his age. It was true he kept it hidden well; even his hair was a young and healthy shade of blond. He let out another even longer one when she told him about her views on the court etiquette. He mention of what people told him earned a bit of a frown however and making him tap his throne a little annoyed. Of course he knew that what they were saying was a load of lies, it seemed almost condescending to think otherwise. He waved her off letting her leave unimpeded, perhaps with a man pretending to spy on her sent too for the Emperor's amusement.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He would give an exaggerated \"haha\" upon her comment regarding his age. It was true he kept it hidden well; even his hair was a young and healthy shade of blond. He let out another even longer one when she told him about her views on the court etiquette. He mention of what people told him earned a bit of a frown however and making him tap his throne a little annoyed. Of course he knew that what they were saying was a load of lies, it seemed almost condescending to think otherwise. He waved her off letting her leave unimpeded, perhaps with a man pretending to spy on her sent too for the Emperor's amusement.\u00a0"}, "post-57863": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1481301754000", "message": "After all of the ruckus and chaos of the poisoning at court -- a tale that would live on, and on, and on given its notoriety, Franz was with Aleksander in the Emperor's personal study, a room just off the Emperor's bedroom.Of course, an action needed to be done and hastily, but just what action would that be? Franz was as steady as a rock, simply watching the Emperor for a moment. Although Aleksander knew and had known that Franz would always give a direct opinion, the Steward knew better than to abuse what leniency he had been given. He knew when to give orders, and when to take them.Franz had personally overseen that all those afflicted with sickness from the poisoning were taken to their rooms, a priest and apothecary for each. The little lady at the ball who had begun barking orders was not incorrect in how to purge; it was an easy lesson, one that any healer or apothecary or herbologist worth their salt would know. Those that were dead were also put to their rooms, with staff meant to oversee the packing of their belongings and to make sure their bodies were not disturbed for those that wanted to travel back to their estates for proper burial there.Official, impersonal missives had already been sent out to the families of the dead that bore the Emperor's insignia, but not his seal -- a sign to anyone reading the letter that protocol had been followed, but the Emperor himself had not added any personal touches. That would be save for a letter date, when letters would be received with the Emperor's personal SEAL upon his missives.All that remained now was to deal with the after effects of such a shock. Within 48 hours, the new Emperor had been crowned, and his inaugural ball had been poisoned, resulting in the death of the Grand Prince of Rauczech, and numerous lords and ladies. Franz had an opinion -- for he always had an opinion -- but he waited for the correct time to voice it.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "After all of the ruckus and chaos of the poisoning at court -- a tale that would live on, and on, and on given its notoriety, Franz was with Aleksander in the Emperor's personal study, a room just off the Emperor's bedroom."}, "post-57923": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1481318081000", "message": "The Emperor went through his study door red faced, eyes full of fury and lots of items of clothing untied or unbuttoned to give him some air. His event was a total disaster and people he needed if not liked were dead. There was of course, the pregnant woman too, which made him very angry. If the assassin would be caught, then him and the Emperor would get some... alone time.\u00a0He nodded briefly to Franz and sat down, rubbing his eyes with his fists. He looked over what was at his desk and sighed, not wanting to do paperwork at the very moment. He stood up with a smash upon the chair he was sitting on moments later, not caring about the expense. It would be dealt with, of course.\u00a0Finally he stood straight and walked to the window, looking out upon the Empire that was now his. \"I am sure we both know what the topic will be today.\" he said. \"The ball has had a poisoning and now I have to deal with it.\" The left hand of Vessia's ruler went to his hair, fingers running down it. \"The aftermath is... quite the nuisance. So far, I have considered only the immediate consequences, the Rauczechs, national security, and blame for the occurrence. On the subject of security of the nation the answer either falls to me simply blaming the old Regime's security, the protocols of which were still in use here. While Emperor Wladimir was a great man there is no doubt, it is clear his designs are at fault for what happened which let me tell you is quite true. Unless of course, I make it appear as though all is as planned; instil fear in the nobles. This would also be useful, especially with the reforms sympathetic to the commoner I am to make. Finally, there is the matter of the deceased Prince Nikandros. If I make it appear as though all is as planned then a contract for his half-brother to vote for me are... minuscule to say the least. I can of course make the public think one thing and tell the successor another thing, in confidence of course. However, they may see it as an affront when I toy with the truth regarding the demise of the very most prominent part of their family, in my ball no less.\"The ruler sighed, rubbing his knuckle that still had pieces of wood in it. \"I think the best thing to do is to go forth as such. I let it be known what happened, I reveal the information that a changeling is on the loose. I blame the fact he got within on the previous Emperor's guard protocols and plans. Finally, I shall say that it was a rogue noble that had assigned this, since it is no doubt paid for by someone of them. However, I say that they are a sympathiser to the Easterners and such to explain how they got a hold of such a person. By such means I can appease the populace, the nobles, and the new elector to take up the late Prince's place. As such, I should be able to recover the nation from the tragedy and perhaps even improve on the status quo.\" he said, giving a slight turn of his head to look at Franz, curious to see if the man would comment.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor went through his study door red faced, eyes full of fury and lots of items of clothing untied or unbuttoned to give him some air. His event was a total disaster and people he needed if not liked were dead. There was of course, the pregnant woman too, which made him very angry. If the assassin would be caught, then him and the Emperor would get some... alone time.\u00a0"}, "post-57934": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1481325938000", "message": "Franz stood by as the Emperor released his anger and frustration at the situation. He was patient, although a brow perked on his face at the tantrum. He didn't have to say anything about it, however, just let the man vent. And then he allowed the man to talk.The Emperor believed he should blame the poisoning on the old regime, or imply that he himself had somehow ordered the poisoning in order to instill fear in the nobility. The man then made confusing statements about the Prince of Rauczech, but Franz was able to gather that it seemed the Emperor wanted to make it seem as if it was the Prince who was at fault for the poisoning.Finally, the Emperor seemed to form a plan that he would blame the poisoning on a \"rogue noble\" who was a sympathizer with the Barbarian Horde in Swavia. And then, he looked at Franz, and the Steward understood that it was his signal.\"With all due respect, Your Imperial Highness, the blame game is for children, of which you are not one and never were one,\" Franz pointed out. \"It has been less than 24 hours from the event, and until more information is gained, I suggest you distract instead of blame. Make a speech, instead, describing the lowness of a such a person that would kill innocent people, and describe instead how you will overcome. Do not, by any means, speak of a changeling on the loose. If you want real chaos, Your Imperial Highness, tell the sitting hens there's a fox in the chicken coup.\"He moved forward and reached out to brush at the Emperor's clothing with his gloved hand, straightened a bit, and took his rumpled neck cloth from him, turning to wind it neatly and set it on his desk. \"I find it interesting that it was the Grand Prince of Rauczech that was killed. He had progressive ideas -- for a Rauczech, anyway -- and no heir, and now he's dead. It is possible, Your Imperial Highness, that this poisoning was not meant for you, but for others.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Franz stood by as the Emperor released his anger and frustration at the situation. He was patient, although a brow perked on his face at the tantrum. He didn't have to say anything about it, however, just let the man vent. And then he allowed the man to talk."}, "post-57953": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1481334550000", "message": "The Emperor pace about listening to the advisor, chuckling every so often. When the man finally finished he stood facing him, hands behind his back and a more relaxed fraternal smile on his face. \"The blame game is what our court is based on, Franz. People want fast reactions and ideas. Fear is exactly what I want Franz. It will help foster a hate for the Witch and the barbarian, and it will make the people more self-determined and thus make my attempts to help the commoner more effective. I know the poisoning was for others, if it was for me I would not be having a chat with you right now, although this may be sheer like since I drank wine prior to the poisoning.\" The divine ruler walked backed to the table to sign a few menial papers while he was thinking. \"What do you think of replacing the Rauczech's for Electorhood, Franz?\" He asked not looking up.\u00a0\"There is of course, the matter of the coming Wintertide Festivities.\" He stated, brightening up a little. \"While yes we have to deal with die Krampus, I have something to look forward to. As I am sure you know, Aurelia of Hapsburg-Portainne has invited me to her home. I have... interests with that house, her, her son, and her brother in particular.\" He sat down upon another chair, resting his head on his hands and affording himself a chance to close his eyes. \"Do you think I should do anything beyond visiting the Duchess? I hope to make... good relations with her and her near family.\"\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor pace about listening to the advisor, chuckling every so often. When the man finally finished he stood facing him, hands behind his back and a more relaxed fraternal smile on his face. \"The blame game is what our court is based on, Franz. People want fast reactions and ideas. Fear is exactly what I want Franz. It will help foster a hate for the Witch and the barbarian, and it will make the people more self-determined and thus make my attempts to help the commoner more effective. I know the poisoning was for others, if it was for me I would not be having a chat with you right now, although this may be sheer like since I drank wine prior to the poisoning.\" The divine ruler walked backed to the table to sign a few menial papers while he was thinking. \"What do you think of replacing the Rauczech's for Electorhood, Franz?\" He asked not looking up.\u00a0"}, "post-58021": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1481424206000", "message": "\"Wield fear carefully, Your Imperial Highness,\" Franz warned. \"Fear can easily turn to hate, and the targets for such can change swiftly.\" It was all Franz felt he could advise on the matter, however. He knew he had some leniency when he spoke to the Emperor, but he was wise enough not to abuse such a privilege. He stood calmly, one hand grasping his wrist behind his back, his uniform crisp. If the man was tired after the long hours he put in for the day, it didn't show at all. His entire demeanor was as calm as tone. \"Replacing, Your Imperial Highness?\" he asked, one dark brow arching on his face. \"Do you mean to shift the electorship from the Grand Prince of Rauczech to some other noble?\" He needed a better definition of the question posed to him.The Emperor mentioned the Duchess, and Franz sought control. Control from smiling. Even a blind man would notice Aurelia of Hapsburg-Portainne. Now that her year of mourning was over for the former Duke, he was not surprised in the least that the Emperor was asking. Indeed, he knew that more than a few men planned to try and... navigate the waters. \"The Duchess can be a powerful political ally. She is more than aware of how to play the game, and is one of its leading players. I would only be sure that you do not find yourself played, Your Imperial Highness.\" Unless he happened to enjoy the... games.\"When will you be leaving for the Hapsburg Palace? I will have your things prepared.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Wield fear carefully, Your Imperial Highness,\" Franz warned. \"Fear can easily turn to hate, and the targets for such can change swiftly.\" It was all Franz felt he could advise on the matter, however. He knew he had some leniency when he spoke to the Emperor, but he was wise enough not to abuse such a privilege. "}, "post-58038": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1481435462000", "message": "The Emperor went a little grim when Franz spoke of fear. He scratched his chin with his middle, index and ring finger of his right hand, his teeth grinding upon each other. \"Fear is unpredictable I must agree, and while hate is also useful to me having it turn or become too broad would be catastrophic. With Krampus around I suppose I best wait on the announcement of a changeling about until the ices thaw, but I will insist on telling of the inefficiency of the security and how I am not at fault.\" He was satisfied with this compromise of ideas and unless the Steward had anymore to add he would drop the subject. He was already quite angry, he did not want to keep at such an upsetting to him subject. For all he knew he would end up releasing his anger on a squishier target.\u00a0He turned to wholly face Franz when he restated what the Emperor meant regarding the Rauczechs. \"Well... to be put bluntly, yes. I need an elector to sign off to vote for my successor or next of kin when I die or abdicate. While I still need a chat with their new head, I doubt they will be too warm to me. I was considering the Duke Artorius; not a man too clever, but stately and knowing vaguely of his kin I doubt his successor will be too different.\" He chuckled a little with a weary rub of the eyes remembering some tales of the Dukes daughter. \"Although if there are other good houses I am all ears. I remember now that I also need to assign a Governor or Protospatharius for Augustgrad. With Adrian here I can now fill the spot of the deceased one of Swavia, and the one for Romulburg is still filled but Augustgrad needs one, although I can put that off for just a little right now.\" He sighed, having to balance the value of efficiency and flashiness for a candidate to be in such a role.\u00a0The Emperor sat down again when Franz spoke of the Duchess, the ruler smiling openly when the woman was spoken of. \"Franz I'm sure you know quite well of the exact kind of... lady I like. I like someone who just like you is clever enough to at least challenge my ideas, and who can help me with the Empire.\" The man gave the Steward a quick glance and then returned to staring to the various paperwork about. \"I'm not one to fall for concrete beauty even if I can appreciate it. I can offer her a lot just like she can to me. I can make her brother the High Eclessiarch, and it would do good to be close to the most powerful man in Vessia.\" The Emperor paused for a moment, deciding that he may as well reveal his full intents. \"She's really the best choice for marriage but the Queen who one may find is a little old and well... odd. Besides, I'm fond of the Duchess's children and already made the promise to go see them. I do not think I could ever 'love' a woman as many do but I may as well make a marriage of convenience enjoyable, useful and fruitful. I already said I want, nay need a son.\" Satisfied with his words, he signed another paper and thought about when he will go. \"Soon.\" He said. \"I need a haircut now so that it would not appear I am getting one solely for the occasion when in fact, I am.\" He added, giggling a little at how slight yet important the detail was to him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor went a little grim when Franz spoke of fear. He scratched his chin with his middle, index and ring finger of his right hand, his teeth grinding upon each other. \"Fear is unpredictable I must agree, and while hate is also useful to me having it turn or become too broad would be catastrophic. With Krampus around I suppose I best wait on the announcement of a changeling about until the ices thaw, but I will insist on telling of the inefficiency of the security and how I am not at fault.\" He was satisfied with this compromise of ideas and unless the Steward had anymore to add he would drop the subject. He was already quite angry, he did not want to keep at such an upsetting to him subject. For all he knew he would end up releasing his anger on a squishier target.\u00a0"}, "post-58042": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1481436492000", "message": "Franz also chose to drop the subject of fear mongering and hate in consideration of the poisonous events of the masquerade ball. He moved toward the desk where the Emperor had signed a few edicts, most of which were just a \"re-up\" of some old laws that people barely paid attention to anymore. Franz worked with subtle movements of his hands as the Emperor spoke on, elucidating on his need for an elector that was NOT the newest Grand Prince of Rauczech. He was heating wax and letting it drip, taking out the seal that spoke of the Royal Seat as a whole, and not the personal writings of the Emperor himself.\"Perhaps Your Imperial Highness can kill two birds with one stone, so to speak,\" Franz stated. \"With Nikandros Aquila dead and only an illegitimate half-brother of scandalized houses, Your Imperial Highness could suggest the Duke Artorius as the new Grand Prince of Rauczech. Your Imperial Highness' suggestion holds weight, and Rauczech does not do well with instability. They will most likely cling to whatever will afford them the smallest change. Rauczech will have its leader, the Grand Prince will keep electorship, and the nobility will be happy.\"He folded the edicts, then held them firm as he dripped the wax onto their faces, gesturing for the Emperor to apply the seal. Discussion of the Duchess had Franz quiet for a moment... and when he spoke, there was a hint of disapproval in his tone. \"... Does His Highness intend to adopt the Duchess' son as his own?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Franz also chose to drop the subject of fear mongering and hate in consideration of the poisonous events of the masquerade ball. He moved toward the desk where the Emperor had signed a few edicts, most of which were just a \"re-up\" of some old laws that people barely paid attention to anymore. Franz worked with subtle movements of his hands as the Emperor spoke on, elucidating on his need for an elector that was NOT the newest Grand Prince of Rauczech. He was heating wax and letting it drip, taking out the seal that spoke of the Royal Seat as a whole, and not the personal writings of the Emperor himself."}, "post-58067": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1481472432000", "message": "The Emperor thought for a moment about the suggestion of Franz, it certainly being a good one. It was all but certain that the Duke will accept such a spot, having a man so controllable yet officially having made few changes but appointing a leader of a house he would put himself in a very comfortable position \"Yes, I think I shall go with such an idea. Having a man like that in power would go very well for me.\" As far as he was concerned, that was that.\u00a0Franz's attitude to the Emperor's words regarding the Duchess's family were surprising to Lord Rexus if not unwelcome. \"Here Franz, I want you to speak wholly from the heart. If I were to do such a thing, what would the problem be?\" He said, keeping his tone level and hoping the Steward would do the same. He stopped signing his name and raised his head to look at the advisor. \"I am fond of children and see no harm in giving one a father.... De facto, yes I think I will. If the young Duke does get elevated to Elector hood which also would not be difficult considering he already has claim to the title, that would serve me very well. He would be guaranteed a good position and life, and would also be warm to the idea of voting for a blood son of mine for Emperor. This would be the first time someone of my family married someone of another major family rather than a distant cousin or intelligent commoner, so I feel doing it with tact, kindness and incentives is the way to continue.\" The Emperor awaited earnestly for whatever rebuttal the man might have.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor thought for a moment about the suggestion of Franz, it certainly being a good one. It was all but certain that the Duke will accept such a spot, having a man so controllable yet officially having made few changes but appointing a leader of a house he would put himself in a very comfortable position \"Yes, I think I shall go with such an idea. Having a man like that in power would go very well for me.\" As far as he was concerned, that was that.\u00a0"}, "post-58133": {"user": null, "user_num": null, "timestamp": "1481557575000", "message": "\"Ah, I see,\" Franz said. \"I misunderstood your reasoning, Your Imperial Highness. I had thought you intended on making the young Duke of Hapsburg-Portainne your heir. I see now that His Highness has a good heart and intends only to take the role of fatherhood,\" the Steward and Confidant said, his tone back to its low, aristocratic nuance. He didn't go into the troubles that would happen if Aleksander did want to make Dareion his heir.\"My final advise, Your Imperial Highness, is to wait. Not all the players have come upon the board with this new change. There may be more eligible women available to His Highness.\" He gathered the letters to get them ready for the mail and put his hands behind his back once more. \"Shall I send for the valet to prepare your for sleep, Your Imperial Highness?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Ah, I see,\" Franz said. \"I misunderstood your reasoning, Your Imperial Highness. I had thought you intended on making the young Duke of Hapsburg-Portainne your heir. I see now that His Highness has a good heart and intends only to take the role of fatherhood,\" the Steward and Confidant said, his tone back to its low, aristocratic nuance. He didn't go into the troubles that would happen if Aleksander did want to make Dareion his heir."}, "post-58139": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1481562382000", "message": "The Emperor chuckled a little before delivering his reply, thinking of both his past and future. \"You know Franz, however much I depend on your advice I am not stupid. As far as I see the rivalry of the Duchess and her near family with her distant family and other house would make the young elector to-be very much in favour of me and my chosen successor. However, I want this to be a certainty by close relation. I like children Franz, but I would never make those two take my name. It would be unkind.\" He knew there was no point trying to make himself look like an angel but at least he could get close.\u00a0He nodded when cautioned, care was an important thing. \"Of course. I'm not going to propose right when I arrive, at least not until I figure out what that wink meant....\" he said. \"Although I doubt there are many other choices so... interesting.\" he said, and continued on in an apprehensive voice. \"The future is uncertain but one can make it certain. Really that was just a feel-good phrase but I would like to believe it.\" With that he retired to his chambers, for once needing rest after his fury.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor chuckled a little before delivering his reply, thinking of both his past and future. \"You know Franz, however much I depend on your advice I am not stupid. As far as I see the rivalry of the Duchess and her near family with her distant family and other house would make the young elector to-be very much in favour of me and my chosen successor. However, I want this to be a certainty by close relation. I like children Franz, but I would never make those two take my name. It would be unkind.\" He knew there was no point trying to make himself look like an angel but at least he could get close.\u00a0"}, "post-60244": {"user": "Godwin von Hessenburg", "user_num": 2098, "timestamp": "1487120725000", "message": "Having left their horses with the rest of the retinue, Godwin and his three sons came to the palace on foot.  The old king did not care for luxury, but even he could not ignore the greatness that was the palace.  He grinned at the thought of Rexus living within.  He had served alongside the current Emperor some years ago in the Swavian Rebellion.Godwin was the King of Hessenburg, and he had rallied a contingent of knights to fight for the Empire against those heretics.  Godwin and his men rode many rebels down in the service of the Empire, earning a fearsome reputation.  A rival lord, however, who bordered and often competed with the House of Hessenburg, entrapped him within a castle.  Godwin awaited help but none came, and so in desperation he and his knights charged out and drove the traitors away before reaching safety.Historically, the province of Hessenburg, derived from Hess or Hesse, was renowned for producing capable horsemen, as they had done hundreds of years ago.  Hessen lancers had wreaked havoc upon many invaders, and when they were subdued and forced into league with the rest of the Vessians, they provided valuable and much-needed heavy horsemen for the growing imperial army.\u00a0 The lords and ladies of Hessenburg were always stubborn, and refused to be stripped of their titles, and in arrogance and debate were eventually allowed to retain the title of King or Queen, second only to the Emperor and his council.Godwin would do all that necessary to gain entrance into the palace and to speak with the Emperor.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Having left their horses with the rest of the retinue, Godwin and his three sons came to the palace on foot.  The old king did not care for luxury, but even he could not ignore the greatness that was the palace.  He grinned at the thought of Rexus living within.  He had served alongside the current Emperor some years ago in the Swavian Rebellion."}, "post-60264": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1487201898000", "message": "The Emperor was listening to his personal orchestra playing for him when a servant arrived and notified him of an arrival. Some \"Godwin\" fellow apparently. The Emperor raised and eyebrow and then he remembered it all, the sound of roaring, men forming ranks and keeping together despite the hail of bolts from crossbows and stones from trebuchet. He still wondered how on that day the rebels managed to get so much field artillery. There was the first attempt at a proper speech he had of course. There, there do you see them? Look at the rabid dogs, look at how they slobber wanting to taste our blood. Well hear me! We shall be the one's who enjoy the warmth of victory, we'll drive the traitorous bastards out and let them be eaten by the barbarian kin they so adore! Do not fear them, fe- the sounds still echoed in his head, and he put his hand to feel the barely noticeable scar on his throat where the carroballista bolt came horribly close to ending him. It was a different time, that was for sure. Different Emperor, Lords, Ladies, Religious figures, appointees, so on and so forth. He was younger than; he didn't have to try to stay youthful then because he was still youthful. His hair was longer and a darker shade, and he had significantly less scars. He also didn't have bastards trying to end him at every nook and cranny. But you were stupid then, you didn't have power, you couldn't mould the Empire to your bidding then! came a voice from his head. Of course, it was simpler then but thinking it was better was just silly.\u00a0He waited for the musicians to finish the two couplets and then waved them into silence, standing up and going to greet Godwin. Still, as Godwin would be brought to meet the Emperor in a study Godwin would still hear the last phrases of the chant.Das klingen fest gefasst und verwegen\u00a0Die feindiche stellung gesturmt!\u00a0Mit \"Hurra\" dem tode entgegen,\u00a0Der gegner ergibt sich und turmt!Finally, as Rexus strolled in he waved Godwin into his seat and sat down himself. \"Good to see you, Lord Godwin. It has been quite some time!\" he said, not bothering with the \"King.\" He was after all, the Emperor now. While the two may have had some camaraderie and even something that one would be forced to admit was friendship he didn't know what the man was like now. He just hoped he wasn't here to make some demands based upon \"the good old days.\"\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor was listening to his personal orchestra playing for him when a servant arrived and notified him of an arrival. Some \"Godwin\" fellow apparently. The Emperor raised and eyebrow and then he remembered it all, the sound of roaring, men forming ranks and keeping together despite the hail of bolts from crossbows and stones from trebuchet. He still wondered how on that day the rebels managed to get so much field artillery. There was the first attempt at a proper speech he had of course. "}, "post-60288": {"user": "Godwin von Hessenburg", "user_num": 2098, "timestamp": "1487288854000", "message": "The clamor of steel, groaning wood, whizzing bolts, and crying men filled the air.  They were targeting an Imperial loyalist force, trying to form ranks and offer at least some defense.  Among them was the man who'd one day become Emperor.  Godwin had met that man, Rexus, and even spoke to him, but he would have never thought he'd become Emperor.  Godwin himself had been in command of a small contingent of knights that day.  They were able to approach the rebel force without notice, forming ranks behind a nearby hill.  Finally, Godwin nodded at his flag bearer and the knights started cantering forward, lances up.  When they reached the peak of the hill the cantering turned into a thunderous charge.  Unfortunately, the rebels had been aware of their position the entire time, and volleys of crossbow bolts were already aimed at the top of the hill.  Dozens of knights fell, and with each second passed the knights' charge became more and more broken.  Only a few dozen knights made it to their destination: the siege engines; after a brutal melee, little more than 25 knights remained.\"Emperor!\" exclaimed Godwin, grinning at the man.  \"It's been quite some time, aye.  And I must apologize for not making it to the ball.  I had some... issues with a few nobles.\"  Godwin shrugged.  \"Politics.\"Not yet sitting was Godwin's sons.  \"My friend, I would you to meet my sons.  Hans, Adolf, and Sibrand.  Different mothers, same seed.\"  Each one was in their young twenties, having been to young to have fought in the Swavian Rebellions.  \"The oldest, Sibrand, will be taking my place as King of Hessenburg soon, and I am sure he will serve you well.\"  He shook his head, \"but that is not what I came here for.\"Godwin reached into his pocket and withdrew a folded letter.  The broken seal of the Duke of Audria was on it.  He handed it over to the Emperor to inspect.  The seal was official.\"I've been in contact with Duke Konrad ever since he left the country.\"  Perhaps Godwin did this out of friendship, or perhaps he sought to use the Order's power to his own ends, as ambitious as he has always been.  \"My last letter to him was a formal request to join the Audrian Order, and to serve under Konrad in my remaining years.  He sent that back.\"My friend, I am grateful for our continued friendship, and I long to see the Fatherland once more.  It is a shame that brother Adrian has abandoned the order, and I cannot imagine why he has chosen the path of a traitor, and a greater shame the remaining brothers in the country have dispersed.  I acknowledge your request to become my subordinate in Audria, but I must deny you entry.You, my old friend, must take up a new responsibility.  The Brotherhood is gone.  Our legacy lives on in Audria, and we flourish.  Adrian was responsible for any reformation, but he has failed me miserably.  I hereby command you to seek an audience with our Emperor, and establish a new order beneath him.  He has far greater challenges than I do, and a union of brothers to serve him may prove useful.Until next time, my old friend,Konrad von Heschburg, Duke of AudriaGodwin would speak as the Emperor finished reading the letter.  \"My days are numbered, Rexus.  It won't be long until I fall into the fiery pits of hell, for I have sinned deliberately.  My final wish is to take up the black cross, first in the service of the Divine One, and second to the Emperor, so that I may be forgiven of my sins.  Perhaps the Judge will look kindly upon me if I serve the church, and I may yet gain entry into Heaven.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<i>The clamor of steel, groaning wood, whizzing bolts, and crying men filled the air.  They were targeting an Imperial loyalist force, trying to form ranks and offer at least some defense.  Among them was the man who'd one day become Emperor.  Godwin had met that man, Rexus, and even spoke to him, but he would have never thought he'd become Emperor.  Godwin himself had been in command of a small contingent of knights that day.  They were able to approach the rebel force without notice, forming ranks behind a nearby hill.  Finally, Godwin nodded at his flag bearer and the knights started cantering forward, lances up.  When they reached the peak of the hill the cantering turned into a thunderous charge.  Unfortunately, the rebels had been aware of their position the entire time, and volleys of crossbow bolts were already aimed at the top of the hill.  Dozens of knights fell, and with each second passed the knights' charge became more and more broken.  Only a few dozen knights made it to their destination: the siege engines; after a brutal melee, little more than 25 knights remained.</i>"}, "post-60296": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1487301451000", "message": "The Emperor put his hands together in an arch, letting his chin rest on a thumb but obscuring his mouth with the rest of his fists. \"Your sons seem like wonderful young men but....\" he said with a glance to the door. The Emperor would speak on regardless of if they left but with just a slightly more harsh tone. \"What is to become of the Brothers dispersed throughout the overworld outside of Audria, Vessia and any other nation of the Divine One?\" he asked, standing up and turning to stare out the window. \"Can they be recalled? I'm... not wholly isolated from the rest of the overworld. As far as I know Adrian came into contact with some heretical sources in a foreign nation. He was looking for part of the One True Scripture, but ended up consorting with a foul entity instead. The loyalty of those he was with needs to be tested. Additionally, there is some merit to what he wanted to do even if his means failed him and the faith. If the Scripture were to be found, we could make the Empire more united than ever, and we could even make a mass conversion of foreign lands as ambitious as that sounds.\" he stated ponderously.\u00a0He sighed and turned back to face the man, hands crossed behind his back. \"You can save your soul in that way, if you desire but the earnesty of those around you and I am sorry to say, you has come into question. Are you not a subversive element? Legio V Swavia \"Wotan\" has finished their training and their clean up of the banditry and rebel elements and will soon be reinforced by Legio II Swavia \"Braveheart.\" Now it is prepared for the serious task of fighting the barbarians and hunting down the traitors. Your information as to the behaviour of Adrian and his accomplices would be ever valued.... You know, between the two of us I thought imprisoning Adrian and the Order's members and wanting to kill them was one of the many mistakes of our previous Emperor. I see now that the mistake was being too weak to carry the action out.\" he said a little wistfully and with a glare at Godwin's sons should they be present. They were too young for all this, and would probably dismiss it as old people talk; something that in the Emperor's mind made him want to pull out people's innards with his bare hands.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor put his hands together in an arch, letting his chin rest on a thumb but obscuring his mouth with the rest of his fists. \"Your sons seem like wonderful young men but....\" he said with a glance to the door. The Emperor would speak on regardless of if they left but with just a slightly more harsh tone. \"What is to become of the Brothers dispersed throughout the overworld outside of Audria, Vessia and any other nation of the Divine One?\" he asked, standing up and turning to stare out the window. \"Can they be recalled? I'm... not wholly isolated from the rest of the overworld. As far as I know Adrian came into contact with some heretical sources in a foreign nation. He was looking for part of the One True Scripture, but ended up consorting with a foul entity instead. The loyalty of those he was with needs to be tested. Additionally, there is some merit to what he wanted to do even if his means failed him and the faith. If the Scripture were to be found, we could make the Empire more united than ever, and we could even make a mass conversion of foreign lands as ambitious as that sounds.\" he stated ponderously.\u00a0"}, "post-60329": {"user": "Godwin von Hessenburg", "user_num": 2098, "timestamp": "1487444568000", "message": "Godwin listened to his Emperor, stroking his beard slowly.  \"When the Duchy of Audria was founded, the entire military force was moved there.  When they secularized, very few remained true Brothers.  Those Knights ventured the world for a time until Adrian called them back together, with the help of two men named Volkwin and Hansel.  They all returned to Vessia.  Their loyalties were tested: those who put Adrian above the Divine One are in hiding; those who remained true to their faith reside in the chapels and chapter houses throughout the Empire assisting the locals.\"\"The Brotherhood is simply spread out in an intangible existence.  It exists as a mere thought, and only because there are those Knights who cling onto the past.  There is no Hochmeister to lead them, not even a Treasurer to distribute their resources and wealth.  I think if a general conclave was to be called the Knight-Brothers might elect a new Hochmeister to lead them.  The only reason they have yet to do so is because their relationship with you hangs in limbo.  They're unsure if you see them as enemies, or as allies.  All you need do is summon them, call the conclave, and have them elect the next Hochmeister.\"Godwin would await the Emperor's response.  Deep down the old warlord hoped he could find some way, any way, to redeem himself in the eyes of the Divine One and the Angels.  He hoped to do this in the form of being a crusader, as a soldier of the Most Holy, leader or not.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Godwin listened to his Emperor, stroking his beard slowly.  \"When the Duchy of Audria was founded, the entire military force was moved there.  When they secularized, very few remained "}, "post-60370": {"user": "Emperor Rexus Aleksander", "user_num": 1958, "timestamp": "1487533629000", "message": "The Emperor sat once more putting a hand over his eyes, whilst drumming one hand's fingers on the table. \"What of those still outside the Empire? If whatever decision we makes is not to their satisfaction they will spread knowledge of the Empire outside of it, they are a threat to the security of the Reich. Right now most people apart from Audrians across the land-bridge have never even heard of the word \"Vessia.\" But with them about it might suddenly become a topic of interest.\" he said. Not looking up he stopped drumming his fingers and put the hand down firmly on the table. \"Do... do what you must Godwin. But I'm afraid Adrian is going to have to die. I don't really have much of an opinion on him, but at this point there is no redemption.\"\u00a0Now he took his hand of his eyes, and stared down. \"Yes... summon a conclave, and bring it here. If they do not agree to some... terms then they will at least be in the perfect place for arrest.\" he said with a little chuckle. \"We can appeal to the peoples too via the Church. If they go against us they will find themselves very friendless....\"\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Emperor sat once more putting a hand over his eyes, whilst drumming one hand's fingers on the table. \"What of those "}, "post-60918": {"user": "Godwin von Hessenburg", "user_num": 2098, "timestamp": "1488584234000", "message": "Godwin nodded, indicating he understood the Emperor's concerns.  Personally, the old warrior did not think the Brothers opposed the Empire in any way, so he did not think they need worry.  At the mention of Adrian, Godwin merely shrugged.  He did not know the lad, and by all accounts the man was a traitor; the fool had not even thought of contacting officials of the Empire, and absconded with a lady of royal birth.  Godwin's was not at all concerned about the man.Godwin stood to leave so he could prepare messages for those Brothers outside the Empire.  Any garrisons, chapter houses, and related institutions would send representatives to the capital in order to discuss the future of the order.  \"I will gather the volunteers and acquire the necessary arms and armaments for the campaign, my lord.  I will be ready to meet with your other field commanders in the meantime.  Farewell, my Emperor,\" Godwin said, giving his old comrade the respect he deserved.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Godwin nodded, indicating he understood the Emperor's concerns.  Personally, the old warrior did not think the Brothers opposed the Empire in any way, so he did not think they need worry.  At the mention of Adrian, Godwin merely shrugged.  He did not know the lad, and by all accounts the man was a traitor; the fool had not even thought of contacting officials of the Empire, and absconded with a lady of royal birth.  Godwin's was not at all concerned about the man."}}